Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RULE PACKAGE
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 527.610 to
527.770.
SECTION 2. (1) The State Board of Forestry shall, as a single rule package following a
single, consolidated rulemaking process:
(a) Adopt rules consistent  with the requirements of the Private Forest Accord Report
dated February 2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry Department on February 7,  2022,
to the extent that requirements in the Private Forest  Accord Report do not contravene
statutory requirements.
(b) As needed to conform with the rules described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection,
and only as needed to conform with the rules described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
amend or repeal the rules in effect on the effective  date of this 2022 Act that implement ORS
527.610 to 527.770.
(2) When adopting, amending or repealing rules as described  in subsection (1) of this
section, the board shall resolve any gaps or  ambiguities in the requirements of the Private
Forest Accord Report by:
(a) Referring to  the intent and structure of the rules implementing ORS 527.610 to 527.770
that are in effect on the effective date of this 2022 Act; and
(b) Achieving the outcomes described in the Private Forest Accord Report.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Publish the Private Forest Accord Report.
(b) Ensure that  the Private Forest Accord Report remains publicly available on a de-
partment website.
SECTION 3.
(1) On or before November 30, 2022, the State Board of Forestry shall  adopt
the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(2) In developing the rule package, the board shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 1
(a) Regularly and closely consult with representatives of the authors of the Private For-
est Accord Report dated February 2, 2022, and published by the  State Forestry Department
on February 7,  2022, to ensure that the rule package is consistent with the intent of the re-
port.
(b) Prioritize development of the rule package over other  obligations to the extent pos-
sible.
(3) Adoption or  amendment of rules included in the rule package is not subject to the
requirements of ORS 183.333, 183.335 or 527.714 or section 39 of this 2022 Act.
(4) When adopting the rule package, the board is subject to the requirements of  sub-
sections (5) to (11) of this section.
(5) The board shall give notice of its intent to adopt the proposed rule package in the
bulletin described in ORS 183.360 at least 30 days prior to  the date proposed for adopting or
amending the rules.
(6) The notice must include:
(a) A caption of not more than 15 words that reasonably identifies the subject matter  of
the rule package.
(b) An objective, simple and understandable statement summarizing the subject matter
and purpose of the rule package in sufficient detail to inform  a person that the person’s in-
terests may be affected, and the time, place and manner in  which interested persons may
present their views on the proposed rule package.
(c) A citation of the law the rule package is intended to implement.
(d) A full or abbreviated list of the principal documents, reports  or studies, if any, pre-
pared by or relied upon by the board in preparing  the rule package and a statement of the
location at which those documents are available for public inspection.
(7) The Secretary of State may omit the information described  in subsection (6)(c) and
(d) of this section from publication in the bulletin.
(8) After giving the notice, the board shall accept public comments for 30 days.
(9) After receiving  public comments, the board may amend the draft rules in the pro-
posed rule package without providing notice or accepting public comments.
(10) The board shall hold one  public hearing before or during which interested persons
may submit written or oral testimony.
(11) The board shall  publish notice of the hearing in the bulletin at least 21 days before
the hearing.
(12) The provisions of ORS 183.400, 183.410 and 183.480 apply to a petition  concerning the
validity or applicability of a rule adopted or amended as part of the rule  package or a rule
amended as described in subsection (13) of this section.
(13) After adopting the  rule package, and on or before July 1, 2023, the board may amend
rules that implement ORS 527.610 to 527.770 to make minor changes  as needed to conform
with the Private Forest Accord Report.
(14) Amendments described  in subsection (13) of this section are not subject to the re-
quirements of ORS 183.333, 183.335 or 527.714 or section 39 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The State Fish  and Wildlife Commission may adopt, amend or repeal
rules as needed to conform with the  rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act, but
may only adopt, amend or repeal rules under this section as needed to conform  with the rule
package.
(2) The provisions of ORS 183.333 and 183.335 do not apply to  an adoption, amendment or
repeal of a rule under subsection (1) of this  section that occurs on or before November 30,
2022.
(3) When adopting, amending  or repealing rules under this section, the commission is
subject to the  requirements to which the State Board of Forestry is subject under section 3
(5) to (11) of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 2
(a) “Common ownership” has the meaning given that  term in section 16 of this 2022 Act.
(b) “Small forestland” means forestland that has  an owner that owns or holds common
ownership interest in less than 5,000 acres of forestland in this state.
(2) Rules adopted or amended as part  of the rule package described in section 2 of this
2022 Act apply only to an operation for which a notification is filed under ORS 527.670 (6):
(a) On or after January 1, 2024.
(b) Before January 1, 2024, if the operation  is not completed on or before December 31,
2023.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, rules adopted or  amended as part of
the rule package that relate to fish buffers apply to an operation, other than an operation
on small forestland, for which a notification is filed on or after July 1, 2023.
(4) If  the State Forester determines that a forest activity electronic reporting and notice
system operated by the State Forestry Department is not updated with the  information
necessary to  implement the requirements of the Private Forest Accord Report dated Febru-
ary 2, 2022, and published by the department on February 7, 2022, in  time for operations to
reasonably comply with the requirements  by January 1, 2024, the deadlines described in
subsection (2) of this section for application of rules that do not relate to fish buffers:
(a) May be extended by the State Forester for a period not to exceed one year; and
(b) After an extension described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, may be  extended by
the State Board of Forestry  only if the board finds that the additional extension is necessary.
POST-DISTURBANCE HARVEST RULEMAKING
SECTION 6.
(1) Pursuant  to the authority granted by ORS 527.710 and subject to the
procedures set forth in ORS 527.714 for rules described in ORS 527.714 (1)(c), the  State Board
of Forestry shall initiate rulemaking concerning the post-disturbance harvest of trees  that,
but for the disturbance, would not  be harvested under rules adopted, amended or repealed
as part of the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The rulemaking:
(a) Must be completed on or before November 30, 2025.
(b) Is not subject to the requirements of section 39 of this 2022 Act.
TETHERED LOGGING RULEMAKING
SECTION 7.
(1) Pursuant to the authority granted by ORS 527.710 and  subject to the
procedures set forth in ORS 527.714 for  rules described in ORS 527.714 (1)(c), not more than
three years after the  effective date of this 2022 Act, the State Board of Forestry shall initiate
rulemaking concerning tethered logging.
(2) The board shall prioritize the rulemaking.
(3) The rulemaking is not subject to the requirements of section 39 of this  2022 Act, but
as part  of the rulemaking, the board may solicit and consider reports that pertain to
tethered logging from the  Adaptive Management Program Committee and the Independent
Research and Science Team described in sections 36 and 38 of this 2022 Act.
JUST COMPENSATION EXEMPTION
SECTION 8.
The Legislative Assembly intends that a person is  not entitled to just com-
pensation under ORS 195.305 to 195.336 for any restriction  placed on the use of real property
by a rule adopted or amended by the State Board of Forestry:
(1) As part of the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 3
(2) After the board has considered reports that pertain  to the rule from the Adaptive
Management Program Committee and the  Independent Research and Science Team described
in sections 36 and 38 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 9.  ORS 195.308 is amended to read:
195.308. Notwithstanding the requirement to pay just  compensation for certain land use regu-
lations under ORS 195.305 (1), compensation is not due for :
(1) The enforcement or enactment of a land use regulation established in ORS 30.930 to  30.947,
527.310 to 527.370, 561.995, 569.360 to 569.495, 570.010 to 570.050,  570.105 to 570.190, 570.305, 570.310,
570.320 to  570.360, 570.405, 570.412, 570.420, 570.425, 570.450, 570.700 to 570.710, 570.755, 570.770,
570.775, 570.780, 570.790, 570.800, 570.995, 596.095, 596.100, 596.105, 596.393, 596.990 or 596.995 or in
administrative rules or statewide plans implementing these statutes.
(2) The enforcement, adoption or  amendment of a rule adopted or amended by the State
Board of Forestry:
(a) As part of the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(b) After the board has considered reports that pertain to the  rule from the Adaptive
Management Program Committee and the  Independent Research and Science Team described
in sections 36 and 38 of this 2022 Act.
LANDSLIDE MODELING
SECTION 10.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) The requirements of the Private Forest Accord Report dated  February 2, 2022, and
published by the State  Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, are premised on specific
landslide modeling developed by a specific contractor.
(b) Implementation of the requirements is contingent  on the ability to use the specific
landslide modeling.
(c) Implementation of the requirements is time  sensitive and requires rapid development
of landslide modeling.
(d) Procurement of services pursuant to this section:
(A) Is unlikely to encourage  favoritism in awarding public contracts or to substantially
diminish competition for public contracts.
(B) Will  substantially promote the public interest in a manner that could not otherwise
be practically realized through  a procurement subject to the requirements of the Public
Contracting Code.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall:
(a) Procure services for development and  application of the landslide modeling described
in chapter 3 and appendix B of the Private Forest Accord Report.
(b) Ensure that the modeling is developed and incorporated into a forest activity elec-
tronic reporting and notice system operated by the department:
(A) In time to  facilitate compliance with the deadlines described in section 5 (2) and (3)
of this 2022 Act.
(B) Not later than May 1, 2023.
(3) The procurement required by this section is not subject to the requirements  of the
Public Contracting Code.
SUBMISSION OF HABITAT CONSERVATION PLAN
SECTION 11.
The State Board of Forestry shall submit to the National Marine Fisheries
Service and the United States Fish and Wildlife Service:
(1) A proposed habitat  conservation plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord Re-
port dated February 2, 2022, and published by  the State Forestry Department on February
7, 2022.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 4
(2) An application for an incidental  take permit, supported by the habitat conservation
plan, for the incidental taking of species addressed in the Private Forest Accord Report.
SECTION 12. (1) On or before December 31, 2022,  the State Board of Forestry shall pre-
pare and submit to the National Marine Fisheries Service and the United States  Fish and
Wildlife Service the habitat conservation plan described in section 11 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The board shall procure the  services of a person to develop and draft the habitat
conservation plan.
(3) Pursuant to ORS  279A.050 (6)(m) and notwithstanding ORS 279B.050, 279B.055,
279B.060, 279B.065 and 279B.070, the board may award a  contract for the services without
undertaking a process  of competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals or so-
liciting competitive price quotes or competitive proposals.
(4) The board shall ensure  that representatives of the authors of the Private Forest Ac-
cord Report dated February 2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry  Department on
February 7, 2022, are:
(a) Regularly and closely consulted concerning the development and drafting of  the
habitat conservation plan.
(b) Consulted if any question arises concerning  the intent of the Private Forest Accord
Report.
(5) The habitat conservation plan and application for an incidental take  permit described
in section 11  of this 2022 Act do not constitute rules for purposes of ORS 183.310 to 183.410
or 527.714.
PASS-THROUGH PROTECTION FOR ENDANGERED SPECIES ACT AGREEMENTS
SECTION 13. Section 14 of this 2022 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 527.610 to
527.770.
SECTION 14. If a person is party to an agreement with the  National Marine Fisheries
Service or the United States Fish and Wildlife Service under  the federal Endangered Species
Act of 1973  (16 U.S.C. 1531 to 1544) and is engaging in a forest practice in compliance with
the agreement, the forest practice is not subject to provisions of ORS  527.610 to 527.770 or
rules adopted thereunder that relate to protection of a species addressed in the agreement.
SMALL FORESTLAND OWNER PROVISIONS
SECTION 15. Sections 16 and 16a of this 2022 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
527.610 to 527.770.
SECTION 16. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Common ownership” means direct ownership by one or  more individuals or owner-
ship by a corporation, partnership, association or other entity in which an  individual owns
a significant interest.
(b) “Small forestland owner minimum option” means any small forestland  owner mini-
mum option available  for small forestland owners pursuant to rules adopted by the State
Board of Forestry under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The board may not establish riparian prescriptions that result in  minimum riparian
buffer widths or lengths that measure  less than the minimum riparian buffer widths or
lengths set forth in sections  5.3.1.3 and 5.3.1.4 of chapter 5 of the Private Forest Accord
Report dated February 2, 2022,  and published by the State Forestry Department on February
7, 2022.
(3)(a) An operator, timber owner or landowner may not follow a small forestland owner
minimum option for an operation unless the department determines that, as of the date the
department receives a notification related to the operation under ORS 527.670:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 5
(A) The landowner of  the forestland where the operation will occur owns or holds com-
mon ownership interest in less than 5,000 acres of forestland in this state;
(B) No more than an average yearly volume  of two million board feet of merchantable
forest products has been harvested from the landowner’s forestland in  this state, when av-
eraged over the three years prior to the date the department receives the notification; and
(C) The landowner has submitted an affirmation  to the department that it does not ex-
pect to exceed an average yearly volume of two million board feet of  merchantable forest
products to be harvested from the landowner’s forestland in this state during the  10 years
following the date the department receives the notification.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(B) and (C) of this subsection,  the department may al-
low a landowner to follow  a small forestland owner minimum option if the landowner estab-
lishes to the department’s reasonable satisfaction that any exceedance  of the harvest limits
set forth in paragraph (a)(B) or (C) of this subsection was or will be necessary to raise  funds
to pay estate taxes or for a compelling and unexpected obligation.
(4) The department may require a landowner to submit, as part of  the notification re-
quired under ORS 527.670, any additional information or statements necessary to determine
whether a landowner meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The board may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 16a.
In any  tax year that a tax credit allowed for use of the standard practice
in lieu of the small  forestland owner minimum option is not available to small forestland
owners, State Board of Forestry rules must provide that restrictions on using  the small
forestland owner minimum option related to the horizontal feet limitation applicable to  fifth
field watersheds are not in effect.
SECTION 17. (1) The State Board of Forestry shall  adopt by rule a Small Forestland In-
vestment in Stream Habitat Program.
(2) The purpose of the program is to provide grants to certain small  forestland owners
to fund projects that:
(a) Result in environmental benefits to fish species addressed in  the Private Forest Ac-
cord Report dated  February 2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry Department on
February 7, 2022; or
(b) Mitigate risks to  natural resources arising from the construction, operation or
maintenance of forest roads or related activities.
(3) The Small Forestland Owner Assistance Office established by  section 19 of this 2022
Act shall implement and administer the program.
(4)(a) To be eligible for a grant under the program, a landowner must:
(A) Own or hold common ownership  interest in less than 5,000 acres of forestland in this
state.
(B) Submit documentation showing that no more than an average yearly volume  of two
million board feet of merchantable forest products has been harvested  from the landowner’s
forestland in this state, when averaged over the three years prior to the  date the office re-
ceives the grant application.
(C) Affirm to the office that  the landowner does not expect to exceed an average yearly
volume of two million board  feet of merchantable forest products to be harvested from the
landowner’s forestland in this state during the 10 years following the date the office receives
the grant application.
(D) Have on file with the State Forestry Department a road condition  assessment that
includes assessment  of all the roads, abandoned roads, culverts and fish passage barriers
located anywhere in the parcel of land on which the project for which grant funding is re-
quested will occur.
(b) For purposes  of this subsection, a landowner must be considered to hold common
ownership interest in forestland if the forestland is owned by the landowner directly or  by
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 6
a corporation, partnership, association or other  entity in which the landowner owns a sig-
nificant interest.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(B) and (C) of this subsection, a landowner may be eli-
gible for a grant if the landowner establishes to the  department’s reasonable satisfaction
that any exceedance of the harvest limits set forth  in paragraph (a)(B) or (C) of this sub-
section was or will be necessary to raise funds  to pay estate taxes or for a compelling and
unexpected obligation.
(5) In administering and implementing the program, the office shall coordinate  with the
State Department of  Fish and Wildlife to prioritize awarding grants for projects on high
conservation value sites, as described in  section 5.3.5.3 of chapter 5 of the Private Forest
Accord Report.
(6) In addition to the requirements described in subsection (4) of this section,  when
awarding grants under the program, the office may consider:
(a) The length of time that has elapsed since an application for a grant was received.
(b) Any potential efficiencies gained through coordinating grant-funded  activities with
other activities at a proposed project site.
(7) The office shall  annually publish, and make publicly available on a website of the State
Forestry Department, a report for the previous calendar year that addresses:
(a) Each funded project that was completed during the calendar year.
(b) The costs of each completed project and the mileage of streams improved  as a result
of the completed project.
(8) The department shall  submit a copy of the report to an appropriate committee or
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, no
later than September 15 of each year.
SECTION 18.
(1) The Small Forestland Investment in Stream Habitat  Program Fund is
established, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Small
Forestland Investment in Stream Habitat Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department
to be distributed by  the Small Forestland Owner Assistance Office described in section 19
of this 2022 Act as grants to small forestland owners under the Small Forestland  Investment
in Stream Habitat Program established under section 17 of this 2022 Act.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the department  for deposit in the fund or otherwise trans-
ferred to the fund.
(b) Any gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for  use as described in subsection
(2) of this section that are received by the department from any public or private source  and
caused to be deposited in the fund or otherwise transferred to the fund.
SECTION 19.
(1) The Small Forestland Owner Assistance  Office is created within the
State Forestry Department.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Support and promote implementation of  financial incentives and technical assistance
programs for small forestland owners that align with  the intent of the Private Forest Accord
Report dated February 2, 2022, and published by the department on February 7, 2022.
(b) Carry out duties related to the Small Forestland Investment in Stream  Habitat Pro-
gram, as described in section 17 of this 2022 Act.
(c) To support compliance with a habitat  conservation plan that is consistent with the
requirements of the Private Forest Accord Report, develop and maintain a database of:
(A) Landowners that the department has determined meet the requirements  set forth in
section 16 (3) of this 2022 Act.
(B) Forestland in this state that is owned by the landowners.
(C) The types and conditions of the forestland.
(D) The roads and streams located within the forestland.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 7
(d) Serve as  the lead coordination and support body within the department for programs,
partnerships and educational opportunities not otherwise described  in this section that sup-
port forestland owners that own or hold common ownership interest  in less than 5,000 acres
of forestland in this state.
(e) Identify and implement opportunities to  leverage the programs, partnerships and ed-
ucational opportunities to support  activities consistent with the habitat conservation plan,
including activities that provide for adequate fish  passage, remove fish passage barriers,
maintain roads or collect data related to the habitat conservation plan.
(f) Engage in any  other duties delegated to the office by the State Board of Forestry or
the department.
(3) The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 20.
The State  Board of Forestry shall adopt the rules described in sections 16,
17 and 19 of this 2022 Act as part of the rule package described in  section 2 of this 2022 Act.
BEAVER (CASTOR CANADENSIS) CONSERVATION
SECTION 21. Sections 22, 23 and 25 of this 2022 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
chapter 498.
SECTION 22. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Beaver” means a member of the species Castor canadensis.
(b) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(2) A person that takes a beaver  on privately owned forestland shall report the taking
to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, including the reason for the taking, the lo-
cation of the taking and the number of beavers taken.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Annually submit a summary of the takings of  beaver reported under subsection (2)
of this section to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission to help the commission better un-
derstand the scale of trapping on privately owned forestland.
(b) Make the summary described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection available to the
public on a department website.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 23.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Beaver” means a member of the species Castor canadensis.
(b) “Forest practices” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(c) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(d) “Small forestland” means forestland whose owner owns or holds  common ownership
interest in less than 5,000 acres of forestland in this state.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 498.012 (1), an owner of  forestland, other than small forestland,
or a designee of the owner, may take a beaver on the owner’s forestland only if:
(a) The beaver apparently poses a threat to infrastructure.
(b) The owner or a designee of the owner first requests that the State Department  of
Fish and Wildlife address the threat to infrastructure apparently posed by the beaver.
(c) The owner or a designee  of the owner waits 30 days after making the request de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection before taking the beaver.
(3) If the department receives a request under subsection (2)(b) of this  section, the de-
partment shall make a  reasonable attempt to nonlethally relocate the beaver, as department
resources allow, or otherwise address the threat to infrastructure apparently posed by the
beaver, in consultation with the owner or a designee of the owner.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and ORS 498.012 (1),  if a beaver on
privately owned forestland damages or imminently threatens infrastructure,  an owner of
forestland, other than small forestland, or a designee of the owner, may take the beaver
without submitting a request to the department under subsection (2) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 8
(5) An owner, or a designee of an owner, that takes a beaver under  subsection (2) or (4)
of this section must report the taking as described in section 22 of this 2022 Act.
(6) In consultation with persons  engaged in forest practices and other interested
stakeholders, the department shall:
(a) Make reasonable attempts to nonlethally relocate beavers, as department resources
allow.
(b) Develop a program for voluntarily relocating beavers.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 496.162 (3), the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission shall adopt
rules to implement this section.
SECTION 24.
The State Fish and  Wildlife Commission shall adopt the rules required by
sections 22 and 23 of this 2022 Act on or before November 30, 2022.
SECTION 25. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(b) “Small forestland” has the meaning given that term in section 23 of this 2022 Act.
(2) A person may not solicit or  accept a fee for trapping a beaver on privately owned
forestland other than small forestland, unless the trapping occurs pursuant to  section 23 (2)
or (4) of this 2022 Act.
(3) A person that traps a beaver on privately  owned forestland other than small
forestland may not sell  or exchange the pelt of the beaver, unless the trapping occurs pur-
suant to section 23 (2) or (4) of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 610.060 is amended to read:
610.060. Except as provided in section 23 of this 2022 Act,  nothing in the wildlife laws is  in-
tended to deny the right of any person to control predatory animals as provided in ORS 610.105.
SECTION 27.  ORS 610.105 is amended to read:
610.105. Except as  provided in section 23 of this 2022 Act,  any person owning, leasing, oc-
cupying, possessing or having charge of or dominion over any  land, place, building, structure, wharf,
pier or dock which is  infested with ground squirrels and other noxious rodents or predatory animals,
as soon as  their presence comes to the knowledge of the person, may, or the agent of the person
may, proceed immediately and continue in  good faith to control them by poisoning, trapping or other
appropriate and effective means.
MITIGATING EFFECTS ON AQUATIC WILDLIFE
SECTION 28.  ORS 496.252 is amended to read:
496.252. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Conservation and Re-
creation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and
Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain  or enhance fish and wildlife resources
in Oregon. The  activities for which the department may expend fund moneys include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Promoting the health of Oregon’s ecosystems and fish and wildlife  species by implementing
conservation programs and strategies identified in the  Oregon Conservation Strategy, as defined in
ORS 541.890, including conservation  programs and strategies for the nearshore identified in the
marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement of the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other out-
door recreation opportunities related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(c) Improving educational  outreach and engagement of the public, including diverse and under-
served communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects  of the department and the State Parks
and Recreation Department or other state agencies as recommended by  the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Advisory Committee established under ORS 496.254; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 9
(e) Other conservation, management, research,  habitat improvement, enforcement, outdoor re-
creation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit in the fund
or otherwise transferred to the fund; [ and]
(b) Gifts,  grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in subsection (2) of this
section, that are received by the department from any public  or private source and caused to be
deposited and credited to the fund[ .]; and
(c) Moneys in the subaccount described in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The  Private Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount is established in the fund. The
subaccount shall consist of moneys  appropriated to the department for deposit in the sub-
account or otherwise transferred to the  subaccount and gifts, grants, contributions or other
donations that are received by the department from  any public or private source and caused
to be deposited and credited to the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be used for:
(a) The purposes described in, and the administration of, section 32 of this 2022 Act.
(b) Conducting outreach to persons that own or operate an artificial obstruction, as de-
fined in ORS 509.580, to further the goal of fish passage.
(c) Conducting outreach to persons that may undertake projects described in section 32
of this 2022 Act.
(5) The department and the Oregon Conservation and Recreation  Advisory Committee
shall jointly submit a biennial report to the Legislative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640
regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the fund, other than moneys deposited in
the Private Forest Accord Mitigation  Subaccount, and on the status of various activities
funded by the moneys.
(6) The  department and the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee shall
jointly submit a biennial report to the Legislative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640  re-
garding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the Private  Forest Accord Mitigation Sub-
account and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 496.254 is amended to read:
496.254. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee  is established as an
advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  and the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purpose of carrying out the duties described in subsection (2)  of this section. The
commission shall determine the number of members of  the committee and the geographical repre-
sentation by the members. The Governor shall appoint the members  of the committee. The Associate
Director of Outdoor Recreation,  or the associate director’s designee, shall serve as a nonvoting, ex
officio member.
(2) The committee shall review department policies regarding the use of Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund moneys , other than policies regarding the use of  Private Forest Accord
Mitigation Subaccount moneys,  and make recommendations to the commission and the department
regarding the use of fund moneys for implementing and administering department activities.
(3) Members of the committee may not receive compensation  for service as members. However,
subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other expenses of  state officers and employees,
a member may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel  and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties from moneys available to the department for the  purpose of re-
imbursement of committee members.
[(4) The department and the committee jointly shall submit a biennial report to  the Legislative
Assembly as provided  in ORS 293.640 regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the Oregon
Conservation and Recreation Fund established under ORS 496.252 and on the  status of various activ-
ities funded by the moneys. ]
SECTION 30. (1) The Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee is established
as an  advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission and the State Depart-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 10
ment of Fish and Wildlife for the purpose of carrying out the  duties described in subsection
(11) of this section.
(2) The  committee shall consist of up to 12 members, including seven voting members
appointed pursuant to subsections (3)  and (4) of this section and up to five nonvoting mem-
bers as provided for in subsection (5) of this section.
(3)(a) The Governor shall appoint the following six voting members:
(A) Three members who represent the timber industry.
(B) Three members who represent nongovernmental  organizations that promote conser-
vation of freshwater aquatic habitat.
(b) In appointing members, the Governor shall solicit and consider recommendations
from the timber industry and  nongovernmental organizations that promote conservation of
freshwater aquatic habitat.
(4) The members of  the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee shall
select and  appoint from among themselves one person to serve as a voting member of the
Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee.
(5) The department shall appoint up to five nonvoting members recommended by:
(a) The State Forestry Department.
(b) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(c) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(d) The United States Fish and Wildlife Service.
(e) The National Marine Fisheries Service.
(6)(a) The term of a voting member is four years.
(b) Before the expiration of the term of a voting  member, the appropriate appointing
authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on the following January 31.
(c) A  voting member may be reappointed but may not serve for more than two full terms.
(d) A voting member appointed by the Governor may be removed only for cause.
(7) In case of a vacancy, the appropriate appointing authority shall make an  appointment
to become effective immediately for the unexpired portion of the term.
(8) The voting members  shall biennially select from among themselves a chairperson and
vice chairperson.
(9) The committee shall meet at least four times per year.
(10) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum for  the transaction of
business.
(11) The committee shall:
(a) Review State Department of Fish and Wildlife policies regarding  the use of moneys
deposited in  the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount of the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund and  make recommendations to the commission and the department
regarding the use of moneys in the subaccount.
(b) Solicit and review grant applications under the Private Forest Accord Grant Program
described in section 32 of this 2022 Act and advise the  commission and department on how
to award grants in a manner that will most effectively mitigate the impacts of forest  prac-
tices, as defined in ORS 527.620.
(12) In undertaking the duties described in subsection  (11) of this section, the committee
may solicit and consider  recommendations from, and otherwise coordinate with, the Oregon
Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee.
(13) Members of the Private Forest Accord Mitigation  Advisory Committee may receive
compensation and expenses as described in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 31.
(1) Notwithstanding section 30 (3)  of this 2022 Act, the voting members first
appointed by the Governor to the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory  Committee
must be representatives of six authors  of the Private Forest Accord Report dated February
2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 11
(2) Notwithstanding section 30 (6)(a) of this 2022 Act, of the  voting members first ap-
pointed by the Governor:
(a) Two shall serve for terms ending one year after the date of appointment.
(b) Two shall serve for terms ending two years after the date of appointment.
(c) Two shall serve for terms ending three years after the date of appointment.
SECTION 32.
(1) As used in this section, “forestland” and “forest practice” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 527.620.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall establish by rule  a Private Forest Ac-
cord Grant Program for the purpose of funding projects  that mitigate impacts of forest
practices by:
(a) Removing structures that block  the passage of aquatic organisms or repairing the
structures to promote the passage of aquatic organisms.
(b) Placing logs or other wood-based material in  streams to promote natural stream
functions.
(c) Conserving, recruiting or reintroducing beavers to restore aquatic landscapes.
(d) Developing or sustaining healthy riparian corridors or wet meadow complexes to re-
duce burn intensity during fires and protect streams from excess sediment after a fire.
(e) Applying restoration treatments to densely stocked, single-species stands of  trees to
hasten the return of riparian function after tree harvesting.
(f) Applying restoration treatments  to stands of trees to enhance historic species diver-
sity that benefits riparian function.
(g) Supporting establishment of conservation easements on land other  than forestland
to protect riparian areas.
(h) Supporting acquisition of an existing water right for conversion to an in-stream water
right, as described in ORS 537.348, to improve in-stream flow conditions.
(i) Installing fencing or otherwise excluding grazing in riparian areas or around  seeps or
springs.
(j) Installing off-stream stockwater systems  or hardened watering gaps to reduce the
effects of grazing on aquatic organisms.
(k) Undertaking other  measures that effectively conserve or restore habitat for aquatic
organisms addressed by a habitat conservation plan that is consistent with  the Private For-
est Accord Report dated  February 2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry Department
on February 7, 2022.
(3) In administering the program, the commission:
(a) Shall develop criteria for awarding a grant and a process for applying for a grant.
(b) Shall award grants to most effectively  mitigate impacts of forest practices, consistent
with advice from the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee.
(c) May award a grant to another agency.
(d) May require the recipient of a grant to report to the commission  on the use of grant
funds.
ADAPTIVE  MANAGEMENT
SECTION 33.
Sections 34, 36, 38 and 39 of this 2022 Act are  added to and made a part of
ORS 527.610 to 527.770.
SECTION 34. (1) It is the policy of the State of Oregon that  regulation of forest practices
for the protection of aquatic species shall, in addition  to other statutory requirements, be
subject to a process  of adaptive management, whereby goals and objectives are validated, and
modified if  necessary, and forest practice rules are monitored for effectiveness relative to
the goals and objectives.
(2) The State Board  of Forestry shall establish by rule an adaptive management program
to accomplish the policy described in subsection (1)  of this section, consistent with the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 12
adaptive management framework set forth  in the Private Forest Accord Report dated Feb-
ruary 2, 2022, and published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022.
(3) The adaptive management program must:
(a) Ensure effective change as needed to meet resource objectives.
(b) Increase the predictability and stability of  the process of changing regulation so
landowners, regulators and interested  members of the public can understand and anticipate
change.
(c) Apply best available science to decision-making.
(d) Effectively meet resource objectives  with less operationally expensive prescriptions
when feasible.
(4) The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules prescribing in detail the roles  and ob-
ligations of the Adaptive Management  Program Committee and Independent Research and
Science Team, consistent with sections 36 and 38 of this 2022 Act and the  provisions of the
Private Forest Accord Report.
(5) The board shall consider reports submitted by the committee and team.
SECTION 35.
On or before November 30, 2022, the  State Board of Forestry shall adopt
the rules described in section 34 of this section as  part of the rule package described in
section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 36. (1) The Adaptive Management Program Committee is established as an ad-
visory committee to the State Board of Forestry.
(2) The committee shall consist of 10 voting members and up to three nonvoting  mem-
bers.
(3) The board shall select a voting member from among two  candidates recommended by
each of the following 10 entities:
(a) The Oregon Forest and Industries Council.
(b) The Coalition of Oregon Land Trusts.
(c) The Associated Oregon Loggers.
(d) A conservation organization collectively selected by Beyond Toxics,  Cascadia
Wildlands, Klamath  Siskiyou Wildlands Center, Oregon League of Conservation Voters,
Oregon Stream  Protection Coalition, Oregon Wild, Portland Audubon and Umpqua
Watersheds, which were  parties to the Private Forest Accord Report dated February 2, 2022,
and published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022.
(e) The Oregon Small Woodlands Association.
(f) The Commission on Indian Services.
(g) A  recreational or commercial angling organization collectively selected by Northwest
Guides and Anglers Association, Pacific Coast Federation of  Fishermen’s Associations, Trout
Unlimited and Wild Salmon Center,  which were parties to the Private Forest Accord Report.
(h) The Association of Oregon Counties.
(i) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(j) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(4) If an entity described in subsection (3) of this section ceases to exist, the  board shall
determine a successor entity that represents the same interests.
(5) The board shall:
(a) Select one representative of the State Forestry Department to serve  as a nonvoting
member.
(b) Invite  one representative of the National Marine Fisheries Service and one represen-
tative of the  United States Fish and Wildlife Service to serve on the committee as nonvoting
members.
(6) The voting members and the nonvoting member described in subsection  (5)(a) of this
section shall serve for terms of four years and may serve an unlimited number of terms.
(7) The committee shall:
(a) Guide the adaptive management process.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 13
(b) Set the research agenda of the Independent  Research and Science Team established
in section 38 of this 2022 Act and recommend to the board the team’s budget.
(c) Assess the scientific findings in a report prepared by the team and prepare a report
that identifies alternative actions, including no action, to address  resource issues identified
in the team’s report.
(d) Submit the committee’s reports to the board.
(e) Assist the board  in the ongoing process of identifying and modifying resource objec-
tives.
(f) Review reports related to compliance monitoring and enforcement.
(g) Submit recommendations to the board concerning rule adjustment, guidance or
training.
(h) Strive for full consensus in committee decision-making.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (7)(h)  of this section, the committee shall make substan-
tial decisions by a vote of at least seven voting members.
(9) Committee members are not eligible for compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses. If an organization represented by a committee member  requests a participation
grant to compensate for the organizational resources the organization dedicated to  support-
ing the committee member’s service on the  committee, subject to available funding, the
board shall award the participation grant in an amount determined by the board.
(10) The board shall  adopt rules describing a process for awarding participation grants
described in subsection (9) of this section.
SECTION 37.
(1) The State Board  of Forestry shall appoint the first voting members of
the Adaptive Management Program Committee on or before November 30, 2022.
(2) Notwithstanding section 36 (6) of this  2022 Act, of the voting members of the com-
mittee first appointed by the board:
(a) Two shall serve for terms ending one year after the date of appointment.
(b) Two shall serve for terms ending two years after the date of appointment.
(c) Three shall serve for terms ending three years after the date of appointment.
(3) The board shall appoint the first voting members of the Independent  Research and
Science Team from a list of candidates provided by the committee.
SECTION 38.
(1) The Independent Research and Science Team is established as an advi-
sory committee to the State Board of Forestry.
(2) The team  shall consist of an odd number of at least five voting members. The voting
members must:
(a) Have demonstrated subject  matter expertise in a relevant field and a graduate-level
degree in a relevant natural resources-related field  such as forestry, silviculture, ecology,
hydrology, wildlife, fisheries or geology.
(b) Include, at all times:
(A) At least one voting member who represents a public institution.
(B) At least one voting member who represents the timber industry.
(C) At least one voting  member who represents a nongovernmental organization that
promotes conservation of freshwater aquatic habitat.
(4) Team members shall serve for  initial terms of four years and may serve an unlimited
number of terms.
(5) A team member may be removed by a  two-thirds vote of the team or by a majority
vote of the board.
(6) If there is a vacancy on the team, or if the team determines that a  new scientific or
technical discipline must be represented on the  team in order for the team to perform its
research duties:
(a) The team shall submit a list of candidates to the board.
(b) The board may appoint one or more of the  candidates as voting members of the team.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 14
(c) If the board does not select one or more voting members from the list  of candidates,
the team shall submit a new list of candidates to the  board until such time as the board
appoints one or more candidates as voting members of the team.
(7) The board shall adopt rules for administering subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The team shall:
(a) Conduct or oversee research  requested by the Adaptive Management Program Com-
mittee.
(b) Report to the board and the committee on the findings of  the research, including
findings concerning the magnitude  of impacts on species of concern, the urgency of needed
action and the degree of scientific confidence or uncertainty behind the findings.
(9)(a) The team shall strive for full consensus in team decision-making.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the team shall make substantial
decisions by a vote of at least two-thirds of the team members.
(10) Team members are not eligible  for compensation or reimbursement for expenses. If
an organization represented by a team member requests a participation grant  to compensate
for the organizational resources the organization dedicated  to supporting the team member’s
service on the team, subject to available funding, the board shall award the participation
grant in an amount determined by the board.
(11) The board shall adopt rules describing a process for  awarding participation grants
described in subsection (10) of this section.
SECTION 39.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the State Board of Forestry
may not adopt, amend or repeal  a rule described in ORS 527.714 (1)(c) that relates to aquatic
resources until the  board has first received and considered reports that pertain to the rule
from the Adaptive Management Program Committee and the Independent Research  and
Science Team described in sections 36 and 38 of this 2022 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 527.714 (7), subsection (1) of this section does not apply:
(a) To adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule as part of a rulemaking proceeding com-
menced pursuant to ORS 527.765  (3)(e) in response to a petition for review of best manage-
ment practices made by the Environmental Quality Commission;
(b) To adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule by the commission;
(c) If the legislation authorizing  or requiring the adoption, amendment or repeal of the
rule provides a specific exemption from this section; or
(d) If the adoption, amendment or repeal of the rule is  necessary to comply with a court
order.
(3) The board may solicit and  consider a report from the committee or the team prior
to or as part of:
(a) A rulemaking proceeding  described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, if soliciting and
considering the report does not conflict with the requirements of ORS 527.765 (3)(e); or
(b) Any  other rulemaking described in ORS 527.714 (1)(c), subject to the funding available
to, and the capacity of, the committee and the team, taking into consideration the require-
ments of subsection (1) of this section.
AMENDMENTS TO OREGON FOREST PRACTICES ACT
SECTION 40.
 ORS 527.620 is amended to read:
527.620. As used in ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990 and 527.992:
(1) “Aquatic resource” means:
(a) A species  addressed in the Private Forest Accord Report dated February 2, 2022, and
published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022,  and the resources on which
the species relies; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 15
(b) If  a habitat conservation plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord Report has
been approved, a species addressed in the  habitat conservation plan and the resources on
which the species relies.
[(1)] (2) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry.
[(2)] (3)  “Cumulative effects” means the impact on the environment  which results from the in-
cremental impact of the forest practice when added to other past,  present and reasonably foreseea-
ble future forest  practices regardless of what governmental agency or person undertakes such other
actions.
[(3)] (4)  “DBH” means the diameter at breast height which is  measured as the width of a
standing tree at four and one-half feet above the ground, on the uphill side.
[(4)] (5) “Edge of the roadway” means:
(a) For interstate highways, the fence.
(b) For all other state highways,  the outermost edge of pavement, or if unpaved, the edge of the
shoulder.
[(5)] (6)  “Forest practice” means any operation conducted on or pertaining to forestland, in-
cluding but not limited to:
(a) Reforestation of forestland;
(b) Road construction and maintenance;
(c) Harvesting of forest tree species;
(d) Application of chemicals;
(e) Disposal of slash; and
(f) Removal of woody biomass.
[(6)] (7)  “Forest  tree species” means any tree species capable of producing logs, fiber or other
wood materials suitable for  the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood or other commercial
forest products except  trees grown to be Christmas trees as defined in ORS 571.505 on land used
solely for the production of Christmas trees.
[(7)] (8)  “Forestland” means land that is used for the growing and  harvesting of forest tree
species, regardless of how  the land is zoned or taxed or how any state or local statutes, ordinances,
rules or regulations are applied.
[(8)] (9)  “Harvest type 1” means an operation that requires reforestation but  does not require
wildlife leave trees. A harvest type  1 is an operation that leaves a combined stocking level of free
to grow seedlings,  saplings, poles and larger trees that is less than the stocking level established
by rule of the board that represents adequate utilization of the productivity of the site.
[(9)] (10)  “Harvest type 2” means an operation that requires wildlife leave trees  but does not
require reforestation. A harvest type 2  does not require reforestation because it has an adequate
combined stocking of free to grow seedlings, saplings, poles and larger trees, but leaves:
(a) On Cubic Foot Site Class I, II or III, fewer  than 50 11-inch DBH trees or less than an
equivalent basal area in larger trees, per acre;
(b) On Cubic Foot Site Class IV or V, fewer than 30 11-inch DBH trees or less than an equiv-
alent basal area in larger trees, per acre; or
(c) On Cubic Foot Site Class VI, fewer than 15 11-inch DBH trees or less than  an equivalent
basal area in larger trees, per acre.
[(10)] (11) “Harvest type 3”  means an operation that requires reforestation and requires wildlife
leave trees. This represents a level of stocking below which the  size of operations is limited under
ORS 527.740 and 527.750.
[(11)] (12)  “Landowner” means any individual, combination of individuals, partnership, corpo-
ration or association  of whatever nature that holds an ownership interest in forestland, including
the state and any political subdivision thereof.
[(12)] (13)  “Operation” means any commercial activity  relating to the establishment, manage-
ment or harvest of forest tree species except as provided by the following:
(a) The establishment, management or harvest  of Christmas trees, as defined in ORS 571.505, on
land used solely for the production of Christmas trees.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 16
(b) The establishment, management or  harvest of hardwood timber, including but not limited to
hybrid cottonwood, that is:
(A) Grown  on land that has been prepared by intensive cultivation methods and that is cleared
of competing vegetation for at least three years after tree planting;
(B) Of a species marketable as fiber for inclusion in the furnish for manufacturing  paper pro-
ducts;
(C) Harvested on a rotation cycle that is 12 or fewer years after planting; and
(D) Subject to intensive agricultural practices such as fertilization, cultivation,  irrigation, insect
control and disease control.
(c) The establishment, management or harvest of trees actively farmed or cultured  for the pro-
duction of agricultural tree crops, including nuts, fruits, seeds and nursery stock.
(d) The establishment, management or harvest of ornamental, street or park trees within an
urbanized area, as that term is defined in ORS 221.010.
(e) The management or harvest of juniper species conducted in  a unit of less than 120 contig-
uous acres within a single ownership.
(f) The establishment or management of trees intended to mitigate  the effects of agricultural
practices on the environment or  fish and wildlife resources, such as trees that are established or
managed for windbreaks, riparian filters  or shade strips immediately adjacent to actively farmed
lands.
(g) The development of an  approved land use change after timber harvest activities have been
completed and land use conversion activities have commenced.
[(13)] (14) “Operator” means any person, including a landowner or timber owner,  who conducts
an operation.
(15)(a) “Significant violation” means:
(A) Violation of ORS 527.670  (6) by engaging in an operation without filing the requisite
notification;
(B) Continued operation in contravention of an order issued by the  State Forester under
ORS 527.680 (2)(a), (3) or (5); or
(C) A violation resulting in major  damage to a resource described in ORS 527.710 (2) for
which restoration is expected to take more than 10 years.
(b) “Significant violation” does not include:
(A) Unintentional operation  in an area outside an operating area of an operation for
which sufficient notification was filed pursuant to ORS 527.670 (6);
(B) Continued operation in contravention of an order issued by the  State Forester under
ORS 527.680 (2)(a), (3) or (5), where an operator, timber  owner or landowner demonstrates
that it did not receive the order; or
(C) Failure to timely notify the State Forester  of an intent to continue an operation into
the next calendar year.
[(14)] (16)  “Single ownership” means  ownership by an individual, partnership, corporation, lim-
ited liability company,  trust, holding company or other business entity, including the state or any
political subdivision thereof. Single ownership includes ownership held under different  names or ti-
tles where the same individual or individuals, or their heirs or assigns, are shareholders (other than
those of public corporations whose stock is traded on the open market),  partners, business trustees
or officers, or otherwise have an interest in or are associated with each property.
[(15)] (17)  “State Forester” means  the State Forester or the duly authorized representative of
the State Forester.
[(16)] (18) “Suitable hardwood seedlings” means any hardwood seedling that will eventually yield
logs or fiber, or both, sufficient in size and quality for  the production of lumber, plywood, pulp or
other forest products.
[(17)] (19)  “Timber owner” means any individual, combination of  individuals, partnership, cor-
poration or association of whatever nature, other than a landowner, that  holds an ownership inter-
est in any forest tree species on forestland.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 17
[(18)] (20) “Visually sensitive corridor” means forestland extending outward  150 feet, measured
on the slope,  from the outermost edge of the roadway of a scenic highway referred to in ORS
527.755, along both sides for the full length of the highway.
[(19)] (21)  “Wildlife leave trees” means trees or snags required to be retained as described in
ORS 527.676 (1).
[(20)] (22)  “Written plan” means a document prepared by an operator, timber owner  or land-
owner that describes how the operation is planned to be conducted.
SECTION 41.  ORS 527.630 is amended to read:
527.630. (1)  Forests make a vital contribution to Oregon by providing jobs, products, tax base
and other social and economic benefits, by helping to maintain forest tree species, soil, air and  wa-
ter resources and by providing a habitat for wildlife and  aquatic life. Therefore, it is declared to be
the public policy of the State of Oregon to  encourage economically efficient forest practices that
ensure the continuous growing and harvesting of forest tree  species and the maintenance of
forestland for such purposes as the leading use on privately owned  land, consistent with sound
management of soil, air, water, fish and wildlife resources and scenic resources  within visually
sensitive corridors as provided in ORS 527.755  and to ensure the continuous benefits of those re-
sources for future generations of Oregonians.
(2) It is recognized that operations on forestland are already subject to other laws and to reg-
ulations of other agencies which deal primarily with consequences of such operations rather  than
the manner in which operations are conducted. It is further recognized that  it is essential to avoid
uncertainty and confusion in enforcement and  implementation of such laws and regulations and in
planning and carrying out operations on forestlands.
(3) To encourage forest practices  implementing the policy of ORS 527.610 to 527.770 , [ and]
527.990 and 527.992, it  is declared to be in the public interest to vest in the State Board of Forestry
exclusive authority to develop and enforce statewide and regional rules pursuant to  ORS 527.710
and to coordinate with other state agencies and local governments which are concerned with  the
forest environment.
(4) It is recognized that ensuring  compliance with, and enforcing, ORS 527.610 to 527.770
and rules  and orders adopted or issued thereunder is essential to protect Oregon’s natural
resources. It is further recognized that  onsite inspections are necessary to further the policy
of ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990 and 527.992.
(5) It is recognized that enforcement of the policy of ORS 527.610 to  527.770, 527.990 and
527.992 is necessary to support the  integrity of the policy and give the public confidence that
standards for forest practices are being followed. It is further recognized that  an effective
enforcement program must include:
(a) Adequate training  and education of enforcement officers, operators, timber owners
and landowners.
(b) Clear technical guidance.
(c) Implementation expectations that are transparent and easily understood by operators,
timber owners and landowners.
(6) It is declared to be the  policy of the State of Oregon that the program for imple-
menting enforcement under ORS 527.680, 527.683, 527.685, 527.690 and  527.700 be adequately
funded, and that the board:
(a) Use inspections and  enforcement as tools to deter future violations and to educate
and train operators, timber owners and landowners.
(b) In exercising enforcement discretion, including discretion to impose penalties, prior-
itize addressing significant violations, other consequential  violations and the actions of re-
peat violators.
[(4)] (7)  The board may adopt and enforce  rules addressing scenic considerations only in ac-
cordance with ORS 527.755.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 18
[(5)] (8)  The board shall adopt and enforce forest practice  rules to reduce the risk of serious
bodily injury or death from  a rapidly moving landslide only in accordance with ORS 527.710 (10).
As used in this subsection, “rapidly moving landslide” has the meaning given in ORS 195.250.
[(6)] (9)  The State of Oregon should provide a stable regulatory environment to  encourage in-
vestment in private forestlands.
SECTION 42. Sections 43 and 44 of this 2022 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
527.610 to 527.770.
SECTION 43. (1) The State Forester, or a representative of the State Forester,  shall
conduct a program of inspections of forestland within the operating areas of operations  for
which notifications are filed pursuant to ORS 527.670 (6), at regular intervals, to  assess
compliance with ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and rules and orders adopted or issued thereunder.
(2) The inspection may occur:
(a) On or after the date on which notification  is filed pursuant to ORS 527.670 (6), but
not more than three years after the date  on which the State Forester learns that the oper-
ation has been completed.
(b) Only at a reasonable time, absent consent or a warrant.
(3) The person conducting the inspection shall:
(a) Advise the operator, timber owner or landowner that the inspection  is being made
pursuant to  the law and is limited in scope to the operation subject to the relevant notifi-
cation.
(b) Ensure that the inspection is tailored to assessing compliance with ORS  527.610 to
527.770 and rules and orders adopted or issued thereunder.
(4) The  State Forester may petition the circuit court of this state having jurisdiction
over the forestland for a warrant authorizing the State Forester or a representative  of the
State Forester to inspect the forestland.
(5) The court may issue a warrant if:
(a) The State  Forester or a representative of the State Forester has attempted inspection
consistent with subsections (1) to (3) of this section  and access to all or part of the
forestland was actually or constructively denied; or
(b) The State Forester has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of ORS  527.610 to
527.770 or a rule or order adopted or issued thereunder has occurred.
SECTION 44.
(1) As used in this section, “photogrammetric mapping”  has the meaning
given that term in ORS 672.002.
(2) To aid in  monitoring compliance with ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and rules adopted
thereunder, the State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules that:
(a) Require persons that file notifications pursuant to  ORS 527.670 (6) to inform the State
Forester when the operations are complete, within a reasonable time after completion;
(b) Authorize the State Forester to use a program of  photogrammetric mapping to de-
termine whether operations for which notifications have been filed pursuant  to ORS 527.670
(6) have been completed; or
(c) Otherwise  establish a program for determining when operations for which notifica-
tions have been filed pursuant to ORS 527.670 (6) have been completed.
(3) Rules described in subsection  (2)(b) or (c) of this section must limit the discretion of
the person conducting the compliance monitoring.
SECTION 45.  ORS 527.680 is amended to read:
527.680. (1) Whenever the State Forester determines  that an operator has committed a violation
under ORS  527.990 (1), the State Forester may issue and serve a citation upon the operator or au-
thorized representative. The State  Forester shall cause a copy of the citation to be mailed or de-
livered to the  timber owner and landowner. Whenever the State Forester determines that the
landowner has failed to comply with the reforestation rules under ORS 527.710, the State Forester
may issue and serve a citation  upon the landowner or authorized representative. Each citation is-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 19
sued under this section shall specify the nature of the  violation charged and any damage or unsat-
isfactory condition that has occurred as the result of such violation.
(2) Whenever a citation is served pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the State Forester:
(a) Shall issue and serve upon the landowner or operator or authorized representative  an order
directing that the  landowner or operator cease further violation. If the order is served upon an op-
erator, the State Forester shall cause a copy of such order  to be mailed or delivered to the timber
owner and landowner; and
(b) May issue and serve an  order upon the landowner or operator and shall cause a copy of such
order to be mailed  or delivered to the timber owner and landowner, directing the landowner or op-
erator, where practical and  economically feasible, to make reasonable efforts to repair the damage
or correct the unsatisfactory condition specified in the citation within a period specified by the
State Forester.
(3) In the event the order issued under subsection  (2)(a) of this section has not been complied
with, and the violation specified in such order  is resulting in continuing damage, the State Forester
by temporary order[ ,] may direct the landowner or operator to  cease any further activity in that
portion of the operation that is resulting in  such damage. Such temporary order shall be in effect
until the date of  the expiration of the period as prescribed in subsection (4) of this section or until
the date that the violation ceases, whichever date occurs first.
(4) A temporary order issued under subsection (3) of this  section shall be served upon the
landowner or operator or authorized representative,  and the State Forester shall cause a copy of
such temporary order to be mailed or delivered to the operator, timber owner and  landowner. If
requested by the operator, timber owner or landowner, the State Board of Forestry,  following the
appeal procedures of ORS 527.700, must hold a hearing on the temporary order within five  working
days after the receipt by the board  of the request. A temporary order issued and served pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section shall remain in  effect not more than five working days after such
hearing unless the order is sooner affirmed, modified or revoked by the board.
(5) If a landowner or operator fails to comply with a final order issued under subsection  (2)(b)
of this section within the time specified in the order, or if the landowner or operator  fails to comply
with a final order imposing civil penalties for violation of any  provision of the Oregon Forest
Practices  Act,  the State Forester may issue an order that prohibits the affected landowner or op-
erator from conducting any new operations on any forestland in this state  until the landowner or
operator has complied with the order to correct an unsatisfactory condition, make repair or pay the
civil penalty, as the case may be, to the satisfaction of the State Forester.
(6) The  State Forester may require an operator, timber owner or landowner to provide
financial assurance before conducting a new operation if the State Forester has, within  the
preceding three-year period, made  a finding under ORS 527.685 (6) applicable to the operator,
timber owner or landowner.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 527.685 is amended to read:
527.685. (1) The State Board of Forestry shall by rule establish the amount of  civil penalty that
may be imposed for a  particular violation. Except as provided in [ subsection (5) ] subsections (5) and
(6) of this section, [ no] a civil penalty [ shall] may not  exceed [ $5,000] $10,000 per violation.
(2) In imposing a penalty authorized by this  section, the State Forester may consider the fol-
lowing factors:
(a) The past history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps or  procedures
necessary or appropriate to correct any violation.
(b) Any prior violations of statutes, rules, orders and  permits pertaining to the Oregon Forest
Practices  Act.
(c) The gravity and magnitude of the violation.
(d) Whether the violation was repeated or continuous.
(e) Whether the cause of the  violation was an unavoidable accident, negligence or an intentional
act.
(f) The size and type of ownership of the operation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 20
(g) Any relevant rule of the board.
(h) The [ violator’s] cooperativeness of the person incurring  the penalty  and the person’s  ef-
forts, if any,  to correct the violation.
(3) The penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or  mitigated upon such terms and
conditions as the board determines  to be proper and consistent with the public benefit. Upon the
request of the person incurring the penalty, the board  shall consider evidence of the economic and
financial condition of the person in determining whether a penalty shall be remitted or mitigated.
(4) The board, by rule, may delegate to the State Forester , upon such  conditions as deemed
necessary, all or part of the authority of  the board provided in subsection (3) of this section to as-
sess, remit or mitigate civil penalties.
(5) For a violation of ORS 527.745, or rules for reforestation adopted pursuant  to ORS 527.745,
the State Forester may impose a civil penalty in an amount equal to the estimated cost of reforest-
ing lands pursuant to ORS 527.690.
(6) If the State Forester makes a finding that an operator, timber owner or landowner
has a history of significant violations that shows a pattern of willful  disregard for the re-
quirements of ORS  527.610 to 527.770 or rules or orders adopted or issued thereunder, the
State Forester may impose a civil penalty in an amount  not to exceed $50,000 per significant
violation. In imposing the  penalty, the State Forester shall consider, in addition to the fac-
tors described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The degree,  if any, to which the operator, timber owner or landowner derived eco-
nomic benefit from the significant violation.
(b) The proportion of total operations conducted by the operator, timber  owner or land-
owner related to  which significant violations have occurred compared to the total number
of operations conducted by the operator, timber  owner or landowner, while accounting for
the organizational structure of the operator, timber owner or landowner.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 527.714 is amended to read:
527.714. (1) The rulemaking authority of the State Board of Forestry under ORS 527.610 to
527.770 consists generally of the following three types of rules:
(a) Rules adopted to implement administration, procedures or enforcement  of ORS 527.610 to
527.770 that support but do not directly regulate standards of forest practices.
(b) Rules adopted  to provide definitions or procedures for forest practices where the standards
are set in statute.
(c) Rules adopted to implement the provisions of ORS 527.710 (2),  (3), (6), (8), (9) and (10) that
grant broad discretion to the board and that set  standards for forest practices not specifically ad-
dressed in statute.
(2) When considering the adoption of a rule, and prior to the notice required pursuant  to ORS
183.335, the board shall determine which type of rule  described in subsection (1) of this section is
being considered.
(3) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the  type described in subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, or if the proposed rule is designed only to  clarify the meaning of rules already
adopted or to make minor adjustments  to rules already adopted that are of the type described in
subsection (1)(c) of this  section, rulemaking may proceed in accordance with ORS 183.325 to 183.410
and is not subject to the provisions of this section.
(4) If  the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c) of
this section, and the proposed rule would change the standards for forest practices, the board  shall
describe in its  rule the purpose of the rule and the level of protection that is desired.  If the pro-
posed rule would change the standards for forest practices that relate to the protection of
aquatic resources, the level of protection that is desired must be consistent with:
(a) Requirements described in the Private Forest Accord Report  dated February 2, 2022,
and published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022; or
(b) If  a habitat conservation plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord Report has
been approved, the terms of the habitat conservation plan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 21
(5) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c)  of
this section, including a proposed  amendment to an existing rule not qualifying under subsection (3)
of this section, and the proposed rule would provide new or increased standards  for forest practices,
the board may adopt such a rule only  after determining that the following facts exist and standards
are met:
(a)(A) If forest practices continue to be conducted under existing regulations[ ,]:
(i) There is monitoring or research evidence that documents that degradation of  resources
maintained under ORS 527.710 (2) or (3) is likely[ ,]; or
(ii) In the case of rules proposed under ORS 527.710 (10), that  there is a substantial risk of se-
rious bodily injury or death;  or
(B) The board has received reports produced by the Adaptive  Management Program
Committee and the Independent Research and Science  Team described in sections 36 and 38
of this  2022 Act that review the new or increased standards the proposed rule would provide;
(b) If the resource to be protected is a wildlife species, the scientific  or biological status of a
species or resource site to be protected by  the proposed rule has been documented using best
available information;
(c) The proposed rule reflects available scientific information[ ,] and, as appropriate, the results
of relevant monitoring and[ , as appropriate, ] adequate  field evaluation at representative locations in
Oregon;
(d) The objectives of the proposed rule are  clearly defined, and the restrictions placed on forest
practices as a result of adoption of the proposed rule:
(A)(i) Are to prevent harm or provide benefits  to the resource or resource site for which pro-
tection is sought[ ,]; or
(ii) In the case of rules proposed under ORS 527.710  (10),  are  to reduce risk of serious bodily
injury or death; and
(B) Are directly related to the  objective of the proposed rule and [ substantially] materially ad-
vance its purpose;  and
(e) The availability, effectiveness and feasibility of alternatives to  the proposed rule, including
nonregulatory alternatives, were considered, and the alternative chosen is  the least burdensome to
landowners and timber owners, in the aggregate, while still achieving the desired level  of
protection[ ; and].
[(f) The benefits to the resource, or in the case of rules proposed under ORS 527.710  (10), the
benefits in reduction of risk of serious bodily injury or death, that would  be achieved by adopting the
rule are in proportion to the degree that existing practices of the landowners and timber owners,  in the
aggregate, are contributing to the overall resource concern that the  proposed rule is intended to ad-
dress.]
(6) Nothing in subsection (5) of this section:
(a) Requires the board to call witnesses;
(b) Requires the board to allow cross-examination of witnesses;
(c) Restricts ex parte communications with the board or requires the board to  place statements
of such communications on the record;
(d) Requires verbatim transcripts of records of proceedings; or
(e) Requires depositions, discovery or subpoenas.
(7) If the board determines  that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section, including a proposed  amendment to an existing rule not qualifying un-
der subsection (3) of this section, and that  the proposed rule relates to aquatic resources,
the board may adopt the rule only after considering reports from the Adaptive Management
Program Committee and the Independent Research and Science Team.
[(7)] (8) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c)
of this section, and the proposed rule would require new or increased standards for forest practices,
as part of or in addition to the economic and fiscal  impact statement required by ORS 183.335
(2)(b)(E), the board shall, prior to the close of the public comment period, prepare and make avail-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 22
able to the  public a comprehensive analysis of the economic impact of the proposed rule. The anal-
ysis shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) An estimate of the potential change in timber harvest as a result of the rule;
(b) An estimate of the overall statewide economic impact, including a  change in output, em-
ployment and income[ ;] related to:
(A) The forest products industry;
(B) Other private sectors such as commercial fishing, recreational fishing and  other
outdoor recreation; and
(C) Government sectors  such as public water system providers, waste treatment and
built and natural infrastructure;
(c) An estimate of the total economic impact on the forest  products industry and common school
and county forest trust land revenues, both regionally and statewide; and
(d) [ Information derived from consultation with potentially affected landowners and  timber owners
and] An assessment of the economic impact of the  proposed rule [ under a wide variety of circum-
stances, including varying ownership sizes and the geographic location  and terrain of a diverse subset
of potentially affected forestland parcels ] on various types of  affected forestland parcels and on
various geographic locations that is derived from consulting stakeholders .
[(8)] (9) The provisions of this section do not apply to temporary rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 527.990 is amended to read:
527.990. (1) Subject to ORS  153.022, violation of ORS 527.670, 527.672, 527.676, 527.740, 527.750 ,
[or] 527.755, 527.788 or 527.797 , or any rule promulgated under ORS  527.710 or section 2 or 44 of
this 2022 Act,  is a Class A misdemeanor. Each day of operation in violation  of an order issued
under ORS 527.680 (3) shall be deemed to be a separate offense.
(2) Violation  of ORS 527.260 (1) is a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of ORS 527.260 (3) is a
Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 49.  ORS 527.992 is amended to read:
527.992. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who fails to  comply
with any of the following may incur a civil penalty in the amount adopted under ORS 527.685:
(a) The requirements of ORS 527.670, 527.672, 527.676, 527.740, 527.750 , [ or] 527.755, 527.788 or
527.797.
(b) The terms or conditions of any order of the State Forester  issued in accordance with ORS
527.680.
(c) Any rule or standard of the State Board of Forestry adopted or issued  pursuant to ORS
527.710 or section 2 or 44 of this 2022 Act .
(d) Any term or condition of a written waiver,  or prior approval granted by the State Forester
pursuant to the rules adopted under ORS 527.710.
(2) Imposition or payment of a civil penalty under  this section shall not be a bar to actions al-
leging trespass under ORS 105.810, nor to actions under ORS 161.635 or 161.655  seeking to recover
an amount based on the gain resulting from individual or corporate criminal violations.
EFFECT OF POLICIES ON INDIAN TRIBES
SECTION 50. (1) Nothing in sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39,  42 to 44, 51 and 52 of this
2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254,  527.620, 527.630, 527.680,
527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105 by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to
49 of this 2022 Act:
(a) Affects the treaty or other rights of a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(b) Applies to real property that is:
(A) Held in trust by the United States for the benefit of  a federally recognized Indian
tribe in Oregon or a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(B) Owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon; or
(C) Owned by an entity that is wholly owned by:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 23
(i) A federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon; or
(ii) A tribally owned or operated corporation organized pursuant to the  Indian Reorgan-
ization Act (25 U.S.C. 5101 to 5144).
(2) The State Board of Forestry shall develop a process for a federally recognized  Indian
tribe in Oregon to  elect to join as an applicant for a habitat conservation plan described in
section 11 of this 2022 Act, consistent with the  terms and requirements applicable to private
forestland under the Private Forest Accord Report dated February 2,  2022, and published by
the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022.
RULEMAKING CONCERNING PESTICIDE APPLICATIONS
SECTION 51.
The State Forestry Department may adopt rules to  implement the pro-
visions of ORS 527.786 to 527.793, 527.794, 527.795, 527.796, 527.797 and 527.798.
REPORTS TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY
SECTION 52. The State Board of Forestry shall report annually to a committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to forestry, in the  manner described in
ORS 192.245,  on progress in implementing the requirements of the Private Forest Accord
Report dated February 2, 2022,  and published by the State Forestry Department on February
7, 2022.
NOTE: Section 53 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
CONTINGENT OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 54. (1) The Legislative Assembly intends that the policies  described in sections
1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42  to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS
195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630, 527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and
610.105 by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022 Act shall remain in  effect only
if:
(a) An incidental take permit related to an approved habitat  conservation plan consistent
with the Private Forest Accord  Report dated February 2, 2022, and published by the State
Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, is issued on or before December 31, 2027;
(b) The State Board of  Forestry has not made a finding that the habitat conservation
plan imposes more  than a de minimis difference in economic or resource impacts, at the
level of landscapes, relative  to rules adopted or amended as part of the rule package de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2022 Act; and
(c) The incidental take permit remains in effect.
(2) The  legislative intent described in subsection (1) of this section is established by
sections 55 to 64 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 55.
(1) If an incidental take permit related to an approved habitat conservation
plan responsive to the Private Forest Accord Report dated February 2, 2022, and published
by the State  Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, is issued on or before December 31,
2027, an author of the Private Forest Accord Report may, no later than 14  days after the
date the incidental take permit is issued,  petition the State Board of Forestry to make a
finding as to whether the habitat conservation plan imposes more  than a de minimis differ-
ence in economic or resource impacts, at the level of landscapes, relative to  rules adopted
or amended as part of the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(2) If the board  receives a petition described in subsection (1) of this section, the board
shall issue a finding no later than 45 days after the date the petition is received.
(3) If the board finds  that the habitat conservation plan imposes more than a de minimis
difference:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 24
(a) On or  before the 91st day after the date the board makes the finding, the board shall:
(A) Repeal new rules adopted as part of the rule package described in section 2 of  this
2022 Act.
(B) Amend rules in effect on or before the effective date of this 2022 Act  as needed to
conform with repeals described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) Amend any other rules as needed to conform with repeals described  in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph.
(b) On or before the 120th day after the board makes the finding, the  State Fish and
Wildlife Commission  shall amend rules as needed to conform the rules with actions taken
by the board under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 56.  If,  pursuant to section 55 (1) and (2) of this 2022 Act, the State Board of
Forestry does not make a finding or finds that the habitat conservation plan  described in
section 55 (1) of this  2022 Act does not impose more than a de minimis difference, as de-
scribed in section 55 (1) of this 2022 Act, and the incidental take permit described in  section
55 (1) of this 2022 Act is subsequently revoked or invalidated:
(1) On or before the 180th day  after the date that any appeals process related to the re-
vocation or invalidation has been exhausted or foregone, whichever occurs  first, the board
shall:
(a) Repeal new rules adopted as part  of the rule package described in section 2 of this
2022 Act.
(b) Amend rules in effect on or before the  effective date of this 2022 Act as needed to
conform with repeals described in paragraph (a) of this paragraph.
(c) Amend any  other rules as needed to conform with repeals described in paragraph (a)
of this paragraph.
(2) On or before the 210th day after the date that any  appeals process related to the re-
vocation or invalidation has been exhausted or foregone, whichever  occurs first, the State
Fish and Wildlife Commission shall  amend rules as needed to conform the rules with actions
taken by the board under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 57. If an incidental take permit  related to an approved habitat conservation
plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord  Report dated February 2, 2022, and published
by the State Forestry  Department on February 7, 2022, is not issued on or before December
31, 2027:
(1) On or before April 1, 2028, the State Board of Forestry shall:
(a) Repeal new rules adopted as part of the rule package  described in section 2 of this
2022 Act.
(b) Amend rules in effect on or before the effective  date of this 2022 Act as needed to
conform with repeals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Amend any other rules as needed to conform with repeals described in  paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(2) On  or before May 1, 2028, the State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall amend rules
as needed to conform the rules with actions taken by the board under  subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 58.
On or before February 1, 2028, the  State Board of Forestry shall report to
a committee or interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly related to forestry, in the
manner described in ORS 192.245, on:
(1) Whether the incidental take permit described in section 11 of  this 2022 Act was issued
on or before December 31, 2027.
(2) Whether the board has received  a petition to make a finding described in section 55
(1) and (2) of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 59. If an incidental take permit  related to an approved habitat conservation
plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord  Report dated February 2, 2022, and published
by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, is issued on or before  December 31,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 25
2027, but is subsequently revoked or invalidated, after  the date that any appeals process re-
lated to the revocation  or invalidation has been exhausted or forgone, whichever occurs first,
the State Board of Forestry shall:
(1) Promptly report the revocation or invalidation to a  committee or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related to forestry, in the manner described in ORS 192.245.
(2) Notify the Office  of the Legislative Counsel of the revocation or invalidation as soon
as practicable.
SECTION 60. Sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act  are
repealed.
SECTION 61. (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 62 and 63 of this 2022 Act, the
repeal of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022  Act by section
60 of this 2022  Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630,
527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105  by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022
Act become operative only if the State Board  of Forestry finds, pursuant to section 55 (1)
and (2) of this 2022 Act, that the habitat conservation plan described  in section 55 (1) of this
2022 Act imposes more than a de minimis difference, as described in section 55 (1) of this 2022
Act.
(2) If the board finds, pursuant to section 55 (1)  and (2) of this 2022 Act, that the habitat
conservation plan described in section 55 (1) of  this 2022 Act imposes more than a de minimis
difference, as described in section 55 (1) of this  2022 Act, the repeal of sections 1 to 8, 10 to
25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act by  section 60 of this 2022 Act and the
amendments to ORS  195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630, 527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990,
527.992, 610.060 and 610.105 by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022 Act become operative on the 150th
day after the date the board makes the finding.
SECTION 62.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 61 and 63 of this 2022 Act, the
repeal of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022  Act by section
60 of this 2022  Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630,
527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105  by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022
Act become operative only if:
(a) Pursuant to section  55 (1) and (2) of this 2022 Act, the State Board of Forestry does
not make a finding or finds that the habitat conservation plan  described in section 55 (1) of
this 2022 Act does not impose more than a  de minimis difference, as described in section 55
(1) of this 2022 Act; and
(b) The incidental take permit is subsequently revoked or invalidated.
(2) If the events described in  subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section occur, the repeal
of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act  by section 60 of this
2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254,  527.620, 527.630, 527.680,
527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105  by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022 Act be-
come operative on  the 240th day after the date that any appeals process related to the re-
vocation or invalidation has been exhausted or foregone, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 63.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 61 and 62 of this 2022 Act, the
repeal of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022  Act by section
60 of this 2022  Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630,
527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105  by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022
Act become operative only if  an incidental take permit related to an approved habitat con-
servation plan consistent with the Private Forest  Accord Report dated February 2, 2022, and
published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, is not issued on  or before
December 31, 2027.
(2) If an  incidental take permit related to an approved habitat conservation plan con-
sistent with the Private  Forest Accord Report is not issued on or before December 31, 2027,
the repeal of sections 1 to 8, 10  to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act by section
60 of this 2022  Act and the amendments to ORS 195.308, 496.252, 496.254, 527.620, 527.630,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 26
527.680, 527.685, 527.714, 527.990, 527.992, 610.060 and 610.105  by sections 65 to 76 of this 2022
Act become operative on June 1, 2028.
SECTION 64. Sections 59 and 62 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2077.
CONTINGENT AMENDMENTS
SECTION 65.  ORS 195.308, as amended by section 9 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
195.308. Notwithstanding the requirement to pay just  compensation for certain land use regu-
lations under ORS 195.305 (1), compensation is not due for[ :]
[(1)] the enforcement or enactment of a land use regulation  established in ORS 30.930 to 30.947,
527.310 to 527.370, 561.995, 569.360 to 569.495, 570.010 to 570.050,  570.105 to 570.190, 570.305, 570.310,
570.320 to 570.360, 570.405, 570.412, 570.420, 570.425, 570.450, 570.700 to 570.710, 570.755,  570.770,
570.775, 570.780, 570.790, 570.800, 570.995, 596.095, 596.100, 596.105, 596.393, 596.990 or 596.995 or in
administrative rules or statewide plans implementing these statutes.
[(2) The enforcement, adoption or amendment of a rule adopted or amended by the State Board  of
Forestry: ]
[(a) As part of the rule package described in section 2 of this 2022 Act. ]
[(b) After the board has  considered reports that pertain to the rule from the Adaptive Management
Program Committee and the Independent Research and  Science Team described in sections 36 and 38
of this 2022 Act. ]
SECTION 66.  ORS 496.252, as amended by section 28 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
496.252. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon  Conservation and Re-
creation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain  or enhance fish and wildlife resources
in Oregon. The activities for which the department may expend fund moneys include, but  are not
limited to:
(a) Promoting the health  of Oregon’s ecosystems and fish and wildlife species by implementing
conservation programs and strategies identified in the  Oregon Conservation Strategy, as defined in
ORS 541.890, including conservation programs and strategies for the nearshore  identified in the
marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement of the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other out-
door recreation opportunities related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(c) Improving educational outreach and engagement of the public, including diverse  and under-
served communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects  of the department and the State Parks
and Recreation Department or  other state agencies as recommended by the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Advisory Committee established under ORS 496.254; and
(e) Other conservation, management, research, habitat  improvement, enforcement, outdoor re-
creation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for  deposit in the fund
or otherwise transferred to the fund;  and
(b) Gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in subsection (2) of  this
section, that are received by the department from  any public or private source and caused to be
deposited and credited to the fund[ ; and ].
[(c) Moneys in the subaccount described in subsection (4) of this section. ]
[(4) The  Private Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount is established in the fund. The subaccount
shall consist of  moneys appropriated to the department for deposit in the subaccount or otherwise
transferred to the subaccount and gifts, grants, contributions or other donations that  are received by
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 27
the department from any public  or private source and caused to be deposited and credited to the sub-
account. Moneys in the subaccount may be used for: ]
[(a) The purposes described in, and the administration of, section 32 of this 2022 Act. ]
[(b) Conducting outreach to persons that  own or operate an artificial obstruction, as defined in
ORS 509.580, to further the goal of fish passage. ]
[(c) Conducting outreach  to persons that may undertake projects described in section 32 of this 2022
Act.]
[(5)] (4) The department and the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee shall
jointly submit a biennial report to the Legislative Assembly  as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding
the expenditure of moneys deposited in the fund[ , other than moneys  deposited in the Private Forest
Accord Mitigation Subaccount, ] and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
[(6) The  department and the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee shall jointly
submit a biennial report to the Legislative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding the ex-
penditure of moneys deposited in the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount  and on the status
of various activities funded by the moneys. ]
SECTION 67.
 ORS 496.254, as amended by section 29 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
496.254. (1) The Oregon Conservation  and Recreation Advisory Committee is established as an
advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  and the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purpose of  carrying out the duties described in subsection (2) of this section. The
commission shall determine the number of members  of the committee and the geographical repre-
sentation by the members. The Governor shall appoint the members  of the committee. The Associate
Director of Outdoor Recreation, or the associate director’s designee, shall serve as  a nonvoting, ex
officio  member.
(2) The committee shall review department policies regarding the use of Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund moneys[ , other than policies regarding the  use of Private Forest Accord Miti-
gation Subaccount moneys, ] and make recommendations to the  commission and the department re-
garding the use of fund moneys for implementing and administering department activities.
(3) Members of the committee may not receive compensation  for service as members. However,
subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other expenses of  state officers and employees,
a member may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel  and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties from moneys available to the department for the  purpose of re-
imbursement of committee members.
SECTION 68.  ORS 527.620, as amended by section 40 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.620. As used in ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990 and 527.992:
[(1) “Aquatic resource” means: ]
[(a) A species addressed in the Private Forest Accord  Report dated February 2, 2022, and pub-
lished by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022, and the  resources on which the species
relies; or ]
[(b) If a  habitat conservation plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord Report has been ap-
proved, a species addressed in  the habitat conservation plan and the resources on which the species
relies.]
[(2)] (1) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry.
[(3)] (2)  “Cumulative effects” means the  impact on the environment which results from the in-
cremental impact of the forest  practice when added to other past, present and reasonably foreseea-
ble future forest  practices regardless of what governmental agency or person undertakes such other
actions.
[(4)] (3)  “DBH” means the diameter at  breast height which is measured as the width of a
standing tree at four and one-half feet above the ground, on the uphill side.
[(5)] (4) “Edge of the roadway” means:
(a) For interstate highways, the fence.
(b) For all other state highways,  the outermost edge of pavement, or if unpaved, the edge of the
shoulder.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 28
[(6)] (5)  “Forest practice” means any operation conducted on or pertaining to forestland,  in-
cluding but not limited to:
(a) Reforestation of forestland;
(b) Road construction and maintenance;
(c) Harvesting of forest tree species;
(d) Application of chemicals;
(e) Disposal of slash; and
(f) Removal of woody biomass.
[(7)] (6)  “Forest  tree species” means any tree species capable of producing logs, fiber or other
wood materials suitable for  the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood or other commercial
forest products except  trees grown to be Christmas trees as defined in ORS 571.505 on land used
solely for the production of Christmas trees.
[(8)] (7)  “Forestland” means land that is used for the growing and  harvesting of forest tree
species, regardless of how  the land is zoned or taxed or how any state or local statutes, ordinances,
rules or regulations are applied.
[(9)] (8)  “Harvest type 1” means an operation that requires reforestation but  does not require
wildlife leave trees. A harvest type  1 is an operation that leaves a combined stocking level of free
to grow seedlings,  saplings, poles and larger trees that is less than the stocking level established
by rule of the board that represents adequate utilization of the productivity of the site.
[(10)] (9)  “Harvest type 2” means an operation that requires wildlife leave trees  but does not
require reforestation. A harvest type 2  does not require reforestation because it has an adequate
combined stocking of free to grow seedlings, saplings, poles and larger trees, but leaves:
(a) On Cubic Foot Site Class I, II or III, fewer  than 50 11-inch DBH trees or less than an
equivalent basal area in larger trees, per acre;
(b) On Cubic Foot Site Class IV or V, fewer than 30 11-inch DBH trees or less than an equiv-
alent basal area in larger trees, per acre; or
(c) On Cubic Foot Site Class VI, fewer than 15 11-inch DBH trees or less than  an equivalent
basal area in larger trees, per acre.
[(11)] (10) “Harvest type 3”  means an operation that requires reforestation and requires wildlife
leave trees. This represents a level of stocking below which the  size of operations is limited under
ORS 527.740 and 527.750.
[(12)] (11)  “Landowner” means any individual, combination of individuals, partnership, corpo-
ration or association  of whatever nature that holds an ownership interest in forestland, including
the state and any political subdivision thereof.
[(13)] (12)  “Operation” means any commercial activity  relating to the establishment, manage-
ment or harvest of forest tree species except as provided by the following:
(a) The establishment, management or harvest  of Christmas trees, as defined in ORS 571.505, on
land used solely for the production of Christmas trees.
(b) The establishment, management or  harvest of hardwood timber, including but not limited to
hybrid cottonwood, that is:
(A) Grown on land that has been prepared by intensive cultivation methods and that is  cleared
of competing vegetation for at least three years after tree planting;
(B) Of a  species marketable as fiber for inclusion in the furnish for manufacturing paper pro-
ducts;
(C) Harvested on a rotation cycle that is 12 or fewer years after planting; and
(D) Subject to intensive agricultural practices such as fertilization, cultivation,  irrigation, insect
control and disease control.
(c) The establishment, management  or harvest of trees actively farmed or cultured for the pro-
duction of agricultural tree crops, including nuts, fruits, seeds and nursery stock.
(d) The establishment, management or harvest of ornamental, street or park trees within an
urbanized area, as that term is defined in ORS 221.010.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 29
(e) The management or harvest of juniper species  conducted in a unit of less than 120 contig-
uous acres within a single ownership.
(f) The establishment or management  of trees intended to mitigate the effects of agricultural
practices on the environment or fish and wildlife resources, such as trees  that are established or
managed for windbreaks, riparian filters or shade strips immediately  adjacent to actively farmed
lands.
(g) The development of an approved land use change after timber  harvest activities have been
completed and land use conversion activities have commenced.
[(14)] (13) “Operator”  means any person, including a landowner or timber owner, who conducts
an operation.
[(15)(a) “Significant violation” means: ]
[(A) Violation of ORS 527.670 (6) by engaging in an  operation without filing the requisite notifi-
cation; or]
[(B) Continued operation in contravention of an order  issued by the State Forester under ORS
527.680 (2)(a), (3) or (5); or ]
[(C) A violation  resulting in major damage to a resource described in ORS 527.710 (2) for which
restoration is expected to take more than 10 years. ]
[(b) “Significant violation” does not include: ]
[(A) Unintentional  operation in an area outside an operating area of an operation for which suffi-
cient notification was filed pursuant to ORS 527.670 (6); ]
[(B) Continued operation in contravention of an order  issued by the State Forester under ORS
527.680 (2)(a), (3) or (5), where an operator, timber owner or landowner  demonstrates that it did not
receive the order; or ]
[(C) Failure to timely notify the  State Forester of an intent to continue an operation into the next
calendar year. ]
[(16)] (14)  “Single ownership” means  ownership by an individual, partnership, corporation, lim-
ited liability company,  trust, holding company or other business entity, including the state or any
political subdivision thereof. Single ownership includes ownership held under different  names or ti-
tles where the same individual or individuals, or their heirs or assigns, are shareholders (other than
those of public corporations whose stock is traded on the open market),  partners, business trustees
or officers, or otherwise have an interest in or are associated with each property.
[(17)] (15)  “State Forester” means  the State Forester or the duly authorized representative of
the State Forester.
[(18)] (16) “Suitable hardwood seedlings” means any hardwood seedling that will eventually yield
logs or fiber, or both, sufficient in size and quality for  the production of lumber, plywood, pulp or
other forest products.
[(19)] (17)  “Timber owner” means any individual, combination of  individuals, partnership, cor-
poration or association of whatever nature, other than a landowner, that  holds an ownership inter-
est in any forest tree species on forestland.
[(20)] (18) “Visually sensitive corridor” means forestland extending outward  150 feet, measured
on the slope,  from the outermost edge of the roadway of a scenic highway referred to in ORS
527.755, along both sides for the full length of the highway.
[(21)] (19)  “Wildlife leave trees” means trees or snags required to be retained as described in
ORS 527.676 (1).
[(22)] (20)  “Written plan” means a document prepared by an operator, timber owner  or land-
owner that describes how the operation is planned to be conducted.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 527.630, as amended by section 41 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.630. (1)  Forests make a vital contribution to Oregon by providing jobs, products, tax base
and other social and economic benefits, by helping to maintain forest tree species, soil, air and  wa-
ter resources and by providing a habitat for wildlife and  aquatic life. Therefore, it is declared to be
the public policy of the State of Oregon to  encourage economically efficient forest practices that
ensure the continuous growing and harvesting of forest tree  species and the maintenance of
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 30
forestland for such purposes as the leading use on privately owned  land, consistent with sound
management of soil, air, water, fish and wildlife resources and scenic resources  within visually
sensitive corridors as provided in ORS 527.755  and to ensure the continuous benefits of those re-
sources for future generations of Oregonians.
(2) It is recognized that operations on forestland are already subject to other laws and to reg-
ulations of  other agencies which deal primarily with consequences of such operations rather than
the manner in which operations are  conducted. It is further recognized that it is essential to avoid
uncertainty and confusion in enforcement and implementation of such  laws and regulations and in
planning and carrying out operations on forestlands.
(3) To encourage forest practices implementing the policy of  ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990 and
527.992, it  is declared to be in the public interest to vest in the State Board of Forestry exclusive
authority to develop and enforce statewide and regional  rules pursuant to ORS 527.710 and to co-
ordinate with other state agencies  and local governments which are concerned with the forest en-
vironment.
[(4) It is recognized that ensuring compliance with, and enforcing, ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and
rules and orders adopted or issued thereunder is  essential to protect Oregon’s natural resources. It is
further recognized that onsite inspections are necessary to further  the policy of ORS 527.610 to 527.770,
527.990 and 527.992.]
[(5) It is recognized that enforcement of the policy of ORS 527.610 to  527.770, 527.990 and 527.992
is necessary to support the integrity of the policy and give the public confidence that standards  for
forest practices are being followed. It is further recognized that  an effective enforcement program must
include:]
[(a) Adequate training and education of enforcement officers, operators, timber owners and land-
owners.]
[(b) Clear technical guidance. ]
[(c) Implementation expectations that are transparent and  easily understood by operators, timber
owners and landowners. ]
[(6) It is declared to be  the policy of the State of Oregon that the program for implementing
enforcement under ORS 527.680, 527.683, 527.685, 527.690 and 527.700 be adequately funded,  and that
the board: ]
[(a) Use inspections and enforcement as tools to deter future violations and to educate and  train
operators, timber owners and landowners. ]
[(b) In  exercising enforcement discretion, including discretion to impose penalties, prioritize ad-
dressing significant violations, other consequential violations and the actions of repeat violators. ]
[(7)] (4)  The board may adopt and enforce  rules addressing scenic considerations only in ac-
cordance with ORS 527.755.
[(8)] (5)  The board shall adopt and enforce forest practice  rules to reduce the risk of serious
bodily injury or death from  a rapidly moving landslide only in accordance with ORS 527.710 (10).
As used in this subsection, “rapidly moving landslide” has the meaning given in ORS 195.250.
[(9)] (6)  The  State of Oregon should provide a stable regulatory environment to encourage in-
vestment in private forestlands.
SECTION 70.  ORS 527.680, as amended by section 45 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.680. (1) Whenever the State Forester determines  that an operator has committed a violation
under ORS 527.990 (1), the State Forester may issue and serve a citation upon the operator or  au-
thorized representative. The State Forester shall cause a copy of the citation to be  mailed or de-
livered to the timber owner and landowner. Whenever the State Forester determines  that the
landowner has failed to comply with the reforestation rules under ORS 527.710, the State Forester
may issue and serve a citation upon the landowner or  authorized representative. Each citation is-
sued under this section shall specify the nature  of the violation charged and any damage or unsat-
isfactory condition that has occurred as the result of such violation.
(2) Whenever a citation is served pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the State Forester:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 31
(a) Shall issue and serve upon the landowner or operator or authorized representative  an order
directing that the  landowner or operator cease further violation. If the order is served upon an op-
erator, the State Forester shall cause a copy of such order  to be mailed or delivered to the timber
owner and landowner; and
(b) May issue and serve an  order upon the landowner or operator and shall cause a copy of such
order to be mailed  or delivered to the timber owner and landowner, directing the landowner or op-
erator, where practical and  economically feasible, to make reasonable efforts to repair the damage
or correct the unsatisfactory condition specified in the citation within a period specified by the
State Forester.
(3) In the event the order issued under subsection  (2)(a) of this section has not been complied
with, and the violation specified in such order  is resulting in continuing damage, the State Forester
by temporary order may direct the landowner or  operator to cease any further activity in that
portion of the operation that is resulting in  such damage. Such temporary order shall be in effect
until the date of  the expiration of the period as prescribed in subsection (4) of this section or until
the date that the violation ceases, whichever date occurs first.
(4) A temporary order issued under subsection (3) of this  section shall be served upon the
landowner or operator or authorized representative,  and the State Forester shall cause a copy of
such temporary order to be mailed or delivered to the operator, timber owner and  landowner. If
requested by the operator, timber owner or landowner, the State Board of Forestry,  following the
appeal procedures of ORS 527.700, must hold a hearing on the temporary order within five  working
days after the receipt by the board  of the request. A temporary order issued and served pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section shall remain in  effect not more than five working days after such
hearing unless the order is sooner affirmed, modified or revoked by the board.
(5) If a landowner or operator fails to comply with a final order issued under subsection  (2)(b)
of this section within the time specified in the order, or if the landowner or operator  fails to comply
with a final order imposing civil penalties for violation of any  provision of the Oregon Forest
Practices  Act,  the State Forester may issue an order that prohibits the affected landowner or op-
erator from conducting any new operations on any forestland in this state  until the landowner or
operator has complied with the order to correct an unsatisfactory condition, make repair or pay the
civil penalty, as the case may be, to the satisfaction of the State Forester.
[(6) The State Forester may require an operator, timber owner or  landowner to provide financial
assurance before conducting a new operation if the State Forester has, within the preceding  three-year
period, made a finding under ORS 527.685 (6)  applicable to the operator, timber owner or
landowner.]
SECTION 71.
 ORS 527.685, as amended by section 46 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.685. (1) The State Board of Forestry shall by rule establish the amount of  civil penalty that
may be imposed for a particular violation. Except as provided in [ subsections (5) and  (6)] subsection
(5) of this section, a civil penalty may not exceed [ $10,000] $5,000 per violation.
(2) In imposing a penalty authorized by this  section, the State Forester may consider the fol-
lowing factors:
(a) The past history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps or  procedures
necessary or appropriate to correct any violation.
(b) Any prior violations of statutes, rules, orders and  permits pertaining to the Oregon Forest
Practices  Act.
(c) The gravity and magnitude of the violation.
(d) Whether the violation was repeated or continuous.
(e) Whether the cause of the  violation was an unavoidable accident, negligence or an intentional
act.
(f) The size and type of ownership of the operation.
(g) Any relevant rule of the board.
(h) The cooperativeness of the person incurring the penalty and the person’s efforts, if  any, to
correct the violation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 32
(3) The penalty imposed under this  section may be remitted or mitigated upon such terms and
conditions as the board determines to be proper and consistent with the  public benefit. Upon the
request of the person incurring the penalty, the  board shall consider evidence of the economic and
financial condition of the person in determining whether a penalty shall be remitted or mitigated.
(4) The board, by rule, may delegate to the State Forester, upon such conditions as  deemed
necessary, all or part of the authority of  the board provided in subsection (3) of this section to as-
sess, remit or mitigate civil penalties.
(5) For a violation of ORS 527.745, or rules for reforestation adopted pursuant  to ORS 527.745,
the State Forester may impose a civil penalty in an amount equal to the estimated cost of reforest-
ing lands pursuant to ORS 527.690.
[(6) If the State Forester makes a finding that an operator, timber owner  or landowner has a his-
tory of significant  violations that shows a pattern of willful disregard for the requirements of ORS
527.610 to 527.770 or rules or  orders adopted or issued thereunder, the State Forester may impose a
civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $50,000 per significant violation. In imposing the penalty, the
State Forester shall consider, in addition to the factors described in subsection (2) of this section: ]
[(a) The degree, if  any, to which the operator, timber owner or landowner derived economic benefit
from the significant violation. ]
[(b) The proportion of total operations conducted by  the operator, timber owner or landowner re-
lated to which significant violations have occurred compared to the total  number of operations con-
ducted by the operator, timber owner or landowner, while accounting for the organizational  structure
of the operator, timber owner or landowner. ]
SECTION 72.
 ORS 527.714, as amended by section 47 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.714. (1) The rulemaking authority of the State Board of Forestry under ORS 527.610 to
527.770 consists generally of the following three types of rules:
(a) Rules adopted to implement administration, procedures or enforcement  of ORS 527.610 to
527.770 that support but do not directly regulate standards of forest practices.
(b) Rules adopted  to provide definitions or procedures for forest practices where the standards
are set in statute.
(c) Rules adopted to implement the provisions of ORS 527.710 (2),  (3), (6), (8), (9) and (10) that
grant broad discretion to the board and that set  standards for forest practices not specifically ad-
dressed in statute.
(2) When considering the adoption of a rule, and prior to the notice required pursuant  to ORS
183.335, the board shall determine which type of rule  described in subsection (1) of this section is
being considered.
(3) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the  type described in subsection (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, or if the proposed rule is designed only to  clarify the meaning of rules already
adopted or to make minor adjustments  to rules already adopted that are of the type described in
subsection (1)(c) of this  section, rulemaking may proceed in accordance with ORS 183.325 to 183.410
and is not subject to the provisions of this section.
(4) If  the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c) of
this section, and the proposed rule would change the standards for forest practices, the board  shall
describe in its rule the purpose of the rule and the level of  protection that is desired. [ If the pro-
posed rule would change the standards for forest practices that relate  to the protection of aquatic re-
sources, the level of protection that is desired must be consistent with: ]
[(a) Requirements described in the Private Forest Accord Report dated  February 2, 2022, and
published by the State Forestry Department on February 7, 2022; or ]
[(b) If a  habitat conservation plan consistent with the Private Forest Accord Report has been ap-
proved, the terms of the habitat conservation plan. ]
(5) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c)  of
this section, including a proposed  amendment to an existing rule not qualifying under subsection (3)
of this section, and the proposed rule would provide new or increased standards  for forest practices,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 33
the board may adopt such a rule only  after determining that the following facts exist and standards
are met:
[(a)(A)] (a)  If forest practices continue to be conducted under existing regulations:
[(i)] (A) There is monitoring or research  evidence that documents that degradation of resources
maintained under ORS 527.710 (2) or (3) is likely; or
[(ii)] (B) In the case  of rules proposed under ORS 527.710 (10), that there is a substantial risk
of serious bodily injury or death; [ or]
[(B) The board has received reports produced by  the Adaptive Management Program Committee
and the Independent Research and Science Team described in sections  36 and 38 of this 2022 Act that
review the new or increased standards the proposed rule would provide; ]
(b) If the resource to be protected is a wildlife species, the scientific  or biological status of a
species or resource site to be protected by  the proposed rule has been documented using best
available information;
(c) The proposed rule reflects available scientific information , [ and, as  appropriate, ] the results
of relevant monitoring and , as appropriate,  adequate field evaluation at representative locations
in Oregon;
(d) The objectives of the proposed rule are  clearly defined, and the restrictions placed on forest
practices as a result of adoption of the proposed rule:
(A)(i) Are to prevent harm or provide benefits to the resource or  resource site for which pro-
tection is sought; or
(ii) In  the case of rules proposed under ORS 527.710 (10), are to reduce risk of serious bodily
injury or death; and
(B) Are directly  related to the objective of the proposed rule and [ materially] substantially ad-
vance its purpose; [ and]
(e) The availability, effectiveness and feasibility of alternatives to  the proposed rule, including
nonregulatory alternatives, were considered, and the alternative chosen is  the least burdensome to
landowners and timber owners, in the aggregate, while still achieving the desired level  of
protection[ .]; and
(f) The benefits to the resource, or in the case of rules proposed under ORS 527.710  (10),
the benefits  in reduction of risk of serious bodily injury or death, that would be achieved by
adopting the rule are  in proportion to the degree that existing practices of the landowners
and timber owners,  in the aggregate, are contributing to the overall resources concern that
the proposed rule is intended to address.
(6) Nothing in subsection (5) of this section:
(a) Requires the board to call witnesses;
(b) Requires the board to allow cross-examination of witnesses;
(c) Restricts ex parte communications with the board or requires the board to  place statements
of such communications on the record;
(d) Requires verbatim transcripts of records of proceedings; or
(e) Requires depositions, discovery or subpoenas.
[(7) If  the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including a proposed amendment to  an existing rule not qualifying under subsection (3) of this
section, and that the proposed rule relates to aquatic resources, the board  may adopt the rule only after
considering reports from the  Adaptive Management Program Committee and the Independent Research
and Science Team. ]
[(8)] (7) If the board determines that a proposed rule is of the type described in subsection (1)(c)
of this section, and the proposed rule would require new or increased standards for forest practices,
as part of or in addition to  the economic and fiscal impact statement required by ORS 183.335
(2)(b)(E), the board shall, prior to the close of the public comment period, prepare and make avail-
able to the public a comprehensive analysis of the economic impact of the proposed rule.  The anal-
ysis shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) An estimate of the potential change in timber harvest as a result of the rule;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 34
(b) An estimate of the overall statewide economic impact, including a  change in output, em-
ployment and income related to:
(A) The forest products industry;
(B) Other private sectors such as commercial fishing, recreational fishing and other outdoor
recreation; and
(C) Government sectors such as  public water system providers, waste treatment and built and
natural infrastructure;
(c) An estimate of the total economic impact on the forest  products industry and common school
and county forest trust land revenues, both regionally and statewide; and
(d) An  assessment of the economic impact of the proposed rule on various types of affected
forestland parcels and on various geographic  locations that is derived from consulting stakeholders.
[(9)] (8) The provisions of this section do not apply to temporary rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 73.
 ORS 527.990, as amended by section 48 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.990. (1) Subject to ORS 153.022, violation of ORS  527.670, 527.672, 527.676, 527.740,
527.750[,] or  527.755[, 527.788 or 527.797, ] or any rule promulgated under ORS 527.710 [ or section 2
or 44  of this 2022 Act, ] is a Class A misdemeanor. Each day of operation in violation of an order
issued under ORS 527.680 (3) shall be deemed to be a separate offense.
(2) Violation  of ORS 527.260 (1) is a Class A misdemeanor. Violation of ORS 527.260 (3) is a
Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 74.  ORS 527.992, as amended by section 49 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
527.992. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who fails to  comply
with any of the following may incur a civil penalty in the amount adopted under ORS 527.685:
(a) The requirements of ORS 527.670, 527.672, 527.676,  527.740, 527.750[,] or  527.755[, 527.788 or
527.797].
(b) The terms or conditions of any order of the State Forester  issued in accordance with ORS
527.680.
(c) Any rule or standard of the State Board of Forestry adopted or issued  pursuant to ORS
527.710 [or section 2 or 44 of this 2022 Act ].
(d) Any term or condition of a written waiver,  or prior approval granted by the State Forester
pursuant to the rules adopted under ORS 527.710.
(2) Imposition or payment of a civil penalty under  this section shall not be a bar to actions al-
leging trespass under ORS 105.810, nor to actions under ORS 161.635 or 161.655  seeking to recover
an amount based on the gain resulting from individual or corporate criminal violations.
SECTION 75.  ORS 610.060, as amended by section 26 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
610.060. [Except as provided in section 23  of this 2022 Act, ] Nothing in the wildlife laws is in-
tended to deny the right of any person to control predatory animals as provided in ORS 610.105.
SECTION 76.  ORS 610.105, as amended by section 27 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
610.105. [Except as provided in section 23 of this 2022 Act, ] Any person  owning, leasing, occupy-
ing, possessing or having charge of or dominion over any  land, place, building, structure, wharf, pier
or dock which is infested with ground squirrels and other noxious rodents or predatory animals, as
soon as their presence comes to the knowledge of the person, may, or the agent of the  person may,
proceed immediately and continue in good faith to control them by poisoning, trapping or other ap-
propriate and effective means.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 77.
 ORS 105.810 is amended to read:
105.810. (1) Except as provided in ORS 477.089  and 477.092 and subsections (4) to (7) of this
section, whenever any person, without lawful authority, willfully injures  or severs from the land of
another any produce  thereof or cuts down, girdles or otherwise injures or carries off any tree, tim-
ber or  shrub on the land of another person, or of the state, county, United States or any public
corporation, or on the street or highway in front of any person’s house, or in any  village, town or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 35
city lot, or cultivated grounds, or on the common or public grounds of any village, town or city, or
on the street or highway in front  thereof, in an action by such person, village, town, city, the United
States, state, county, or public corporation, against the  person committing such trespasses if judg-
ment is given for the plaintiff, it shall  be given for treble the amount of damages claimed, or as-
sessed for the  trespass. In any such action, upon plaintiff’s proof of ownership of the premises and
the commission by the defendant of any of the acts mentioned  in this section, it is prima facie evi-
dence that the  acts were committed by the defendant willfully, intentionally and without plaintiff’s
consent.
(2) A court may, in its discretion, award to a prevailing party under subsection (1)  of this sec-
tion reimbursement of reasonable costs of litigation including but not  limited to investigation costs
and attorney fees.
(3) A court may, in its discretion, award to a prevailing plaintiff under  subsection (1) of this
section reasonable costs of reforestation activities related to the injury sustained by the plaintiff.
(4) A contract logger is liable only for actual damages in an action under this section if:
(a) The contract  logger conducts an operation under a signed, written contract with a person
the contract logger reasonably believes to be the legal  owner of the produce, trees, timber or shrubs
in the operation area;
(b) The contract identifies  the operation area by a metes and bounds description or other suffi-
cient legal description;
(c) Before the contract logger begins harvesting in the operation area, the person  who engages
the contract logger under the contract:
(A) Locates, marks and protects from damage all survey monuments in the operation area;
(B) Flags, stakes or otherwise clearly marks the boundaries of the operation area; and
(C) Provides the contract logger with a copy of the deed, contract or other instrument  that the
person who engages the  contract logger under the contract relies upon as proof of ownership of the
produce, trees, timber or shrubs in the operation area;
(d) The contract logger verifies  the deed, contract or instrument described in paragraph (c)(C)
of this subsection against the metes and bounds description or other sufficient legal description  in
the contract;
(e) The contract logger retains a copy of the deed, contract  or instrument described in para-
graph (c)(C) of this subsection for at least three years; and
(f) The contract logger does not receive written notice that any person has  a claim of title to
the land or timber in the operation area that  is adverse to the person who engages the contract
logger under the contract.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not affect an action for double or treble  damages against
a contract logger for damages outside the  operation area as described in subsection (4) of this sec-
tion.
(6) If an action is brought under this section against a contract logger, and  the contract logger
was engaged to harvest the timber by  a person who purported to own the timber or to have au-
thority to harvest the timber, the person who engaged the contract logger must  be joined in the
action as a defendant unless jurisdiction over the person cannot be had. If a judgment  is entered
against the contract logger and against the person who  engaged the contract logger, the contract
logger shall not  be required to pay any part of the judgment unless the plaintiff establishes that the
judgment cannot be enforced against  the person who engaged the contract logger. The plaintiff may
enforce the judgment against the contract logger only if:
(a) The  plaintiff makes a good faith effort for at least six months after the judgment becomes
final and subject to  execution to enforce the judgment against the person who engaged the contract
logger;  and
(b) The court determines, upon motion  of the plaintiff, that all or part of the judgment cannot
be collected from the person who engaged the contract logger.
(7) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section apply in an action against a contract logger under
subsection (4) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 36
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Contract logger” means a person engaged in a commercial timber harvesting operation.
(b) “Operation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620 [ (12)].
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 78.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 673, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for water quality,  is increased by $352,217 to
carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52  of this 2022
Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022
Act.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter 679, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for wildlife division, is increased by $228,558 to
carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52  of this 2022
Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022
Act.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (3), chapter 679, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for administrative services division, is increased
by $567,897 to carry out the  provisions of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50
to 52 of this 2022 Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45
to 49 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 81. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter 679, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for habitat division, is increased by $826,619 to
carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52  of this 2022
Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022
Act.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 679, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the Pacific
Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described
in section 2, chapter 679, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for habitat division, is increased by $64,907 to carry out the provisions
of sections 1 to 8, 10 to  25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there is appropriated to the
State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for  deposit in the Private Forest Accord Mitigation
Subaccount established within the Oregon Conservation  and Recreation Fund established by
ORS 496.252, for use by the Private Forest Accord Grant Program described in section  32 of
this 2022 Act.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  State Forestry Department by section 1 (4), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for private forests, is increased by $14,024,057 to carry
out the provisions  of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this 2022 Act
and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 37
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest  Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2021, collected
or received by  the State Forestry Department, for agency administration, is increased by
$1,021,131 to carry out the provisions  of sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to
52 of  this 2022 Act and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to
49 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  605, Oregon Laws 2021, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for private  forests, is increased by $1,625,000
to carry out the provisions of  sections 1 to 8, 10 to 25, 30 to 39, 42 to 44 and 50 to 52 of this
2022 Act  and the amendments to statutes by sections 9, 26 to 29, 40, 41 and 45 to 49 of this
2022 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 87. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 88. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 38
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-B) Page 39